      "identifier" : [
         "8_05087_546"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "CAN ENT. VOL X /I HENRY HERBERT LYMAN, M .A PLATE XVII, M. Mm",
         "VOL. XLVI. LONDON, JULY, 1914 No. 7 HENRY HERBERT LYMAN, M.A. The appalling calamity that befell the steamship \"Emipress of Ireland\" in the River St. L.awrence near Fatber Pû,int slîortly after iiiid.îight on Friday, May 29th, was acutely brought home to the older members of the Entomalogical Society of Ontario by the sad tidings that Mr. H. H. Lyman and his wife were among the thousand and more who were lost. For some few days ive boped .lgainst hope, b)ut ne trace of them bas been found and tbere is îîot a vestige ta show in what manner death came upon tbem; it seems mast probable that they were drowned in their stateroomn lefore they bad time to escape. Mr. Lyman was to have sailcd .L fortnight carlier, but owing to the pressure of business inatters lie postponed bis departure with sa sad a resuit. . Mr. Lvman was born in Mo,îtreal an the 2Ist of Ocember, 1854 and reccived bis carly education at the High School and \\~etEnd Academy. At McGill University be toak tbe Arts C'ourse and proceeded to the degree of B.A. in 1876, winning the l.agan medal in (;ealgy aînd Natural Science, and received bis ýN.A. degree in 1880. On coîupleting bis college career lie entered. his fatber', firm, Lyinans, Clare \u0026 Ca., wholesale cbcenists and hlruggists in Montreal; in 1885 bu becaine a partner in the business, w baose name liad lîcen cbanged to Lyman, Sans \u0026 C'o. On the Ieatb of bis father lie became senior partner and presiden t of Lxmans, Limited, wbich includes the brancb house in Toronto. lis position iîà tbese important cancernis nîanifests hi, remarkable ',usiness capacity andl the attention lie must have paid to their iffairs. l'le bouses are widelv known tlirougbaut Canada anîd bear the highest reputation for uipriglit ulealing, energy and e iterprise. Thougb nîucb cngrossed witb the management of «a ver%' large buasiness establishment, whicli (lelanded a close attentioni ta in- tutnierable (letails, Mr. Lvmnan faunul timie for an active interest ii many ather tbings. In 1877 lie joincd ibe 5th Battalian of the",
         "222 THÉ CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST Canadian volunteer force (now the Royal Scots of Canada), an\u003cl rose fromn Ensign to Major in 1885, retiring with that rank iii 1891. He was a life governor of the Montreal General Hospital; Treasurer and Vice-President of the Graduates' Society of McGill University; FelIow of the Royal Geographical Society and of the Royal Colonial Institute; one of the organizers of the Imperial Federation League in Canada and a member of the deputation whicli waited upon Lord Salisbury's administration in 1886, asking that an Imperial Conference reprcsenting the whole British Empire. should be summoned. The Conference was held during the follow- ing year. He was also a Director of the British and Colonial Press Service. Though littie interested in local politics he was an ardent Imperialist and considered that the perpetual unity of the Empire far surpassed in importance ail other political questions; he advo- cated Imperial preferential trade and believed that Canada should bear its share of the hurden of Imperial defence. To turn to, a different aspect of bis life, the one in which our readers are more interested-we learn that when only eight year,. of age he began to observe insects and their ways, and when a boy of twelve commenced to form a collection of Lépidoptera, which has n0W become one of the finest and most extensive in Canada. On Jan. 5th, 1875, Mr. Lyman became a member of the Entomuo- logical Society of Ontario by joining the Montreal Branch. At the following meeting he exhibited a case of butterfiies front Illinois, following a custom which has always been characteristic ot the Montreal meetings. These exhibits usually led to discussions in which Mr. Lyman took an active part and spared no pains iii arriving at correct conclusions, studying the original descriptions. and at times taking the specimens to the United States or th British Museum for final determination. He would neyer jump at conclusions but, sparing no time or trouble, would not rest satis- fied tii! certainty was assured. His first paper was presented at the meeting on Oct. ,5tlt, 1875, being a description of the- larva and pupa of Grapta inter- rogationis; this was followed a few months later by a list of Diurnal Lepidoptera taken at Portland, Maine (published in the Can. Ent.. XII, pp. 7-9). For nearly ten years he spent bis annual summet, holiday on the Atlantic Coast, where he added largely to, bis col-",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 223 lections and developed his love for the butterfiies which he took great delight in rearing through ail their stages. The first article from Mr. Lyman's pen which appeared in the Canadian Ento- inologist (Volume VI, page 38), is in the form of a letter asking m qluestions about several butterfiies found at Portland, Maine. In the same volume (page 158), he described the curiously marked egg of Gastropacha americaita. From the l9th to the 44th volume, none have been without at least one article from his pen, and he !lîtely expressed his regret that he failed to contribute last year to Vol. XLV. In addition to his articles in this magazine, he wrote ,,everal of a more popular character for the Annual Reports of our Society, and contributed a few also to \"Entomological News.\" A Iist of his more important.papers is given below. The third annual meeting of the Montreal Branch was held î at Mr. Lyman's residence on May 7, 1876, at which the minute boo0k records that \"ha exhibited his fine collection of local and e'cotic insects.\" This was the beginning of a long series of gather- ings under his hospitable roof; during thirtv-seven years a largeI proportion of the monthly meetings were held there, and were thoroughly enjoyed bv the members and occasional visitors from a distance. They were made especially interesting at times by bis Ielightful accounts of visits to sdientific gathcrings in the United States and Europe as well as iii Canada; he would recounit the proceedings, often with a good deal of humour, and tell of the erninient men whom he met. In the course of ycars he gathercd ogether a large collection of books on the Lepidoptera of Northg .\\merica chiefly, and these he was always most kind -in lending to lus fellow members when they required to consult theni. While interested in everything connected with the Lepidoptera of this continent, he paid little attention to the \"Micros,\" but vas ;4 always keen to acqui-e specimens for study and comparison of suhgenera as Colias, Argynnis, Graptai, Chionobas, Haploa, livphantria, Papaipema, Xylina and Hepialus. His papers on S hlese subjects will always be found of v'alue and interest. On june 5th, 1877, he was elected Vice-President of the Mon- treal Branch and four years later he became President holding the luigher office for two years; in 1888 he again became Ptesident and ctained the Position tili 1899.",
         "224 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. ln 1895 he was elected Vice-President of the parent Sociei% and in 1897 becaiiie President, holding this highest place in th\" Society for the usual tern of two years, to, the great satisfactioni of the members. He rarely niissed one of our annual meetings, and as a permanent Director of the Society took an active part in~ the management of its affairs. His ilîterests, however, were nm confined to bis native land. Many years ago he joined th(- American Association for the Advancement of Science and wa. recenqy much gratified at being elected a Fellow; he used to sa% that an amateur wbo did good work was really more deserving of honour and recognition than a professional Entomologist who received pay for his work. He was also a Fellow of the Entomo. logical Society of America and of the Entomiological Society of London, England; an honorary member of the New York Ento- mological Society and thç Cambridge Entomological Club; for some time hie was Vice-President of the Natural History Socictý of Montreal. His last officiai act was the reading of his report .1, delegate from our Society to the Royal Society at the meeting ini Montreal on Wedncsda\u003e', May 27, the day before he started on his fatal voyage. F~or a long time past Mr. Lyman's friends have been mucli distresscd by his increasing dcafncss, whicb of late bad almo.î becoinc total. Conversation with him could only be carried on1 with the aid of an ear-trumpet or by writing. In spite of tlii, severe disability, lie was always bright and cheerful, full of innocent fun and enioying a harmless joke. He travelled about a great deal, attcnding scientific meetings and other gathering~, among others the International Congresses of Entomology ai Brussels and Oxford, wbicb lie seemed to enjoy, though latter].\\ lie could not hear a word of the papers and discussions. The writer and many friends w.ere greatly pleased as well a- surpriscd when hie informed us that he was about to be marricd. Siiîce the deatb ôf bis mother to wbom he paid devoted attentioni dLlring a long period of weakness and infirmity, hc had been livinv a soniewhat lonely life. Two years ago, in Marcb 1912, he wa- married to a daughter of the Rev. William Kirkby, of New York, formerly rector of Collingwood, Ontario. She'attended with bie, husband the Jubilee meeting of our Society at Guelph last Augîîst ýýI.M",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 225 and charmed ail who had the pleasure of spending any tine1 in lier company. It seems inexpressibly sad that aur two friends should have had so short a period of happy married liec, and have X ended their days together in a tragedy so sudden and so awful. C'. J. S. B. MR. LYMAN'S PU13LIS11ED PAPERS. To the Canadian Entomologist he contributed sixty articles, .îrnong which the following may be mentioned Notes on Colias christina, Vol. XVI, 5. The North American CaUlimorplzas, Vols. XIX, 181, with plaIte, aînd XXI, 231. Can Insects survive freezing? Vols. XXIV, 1, and XXX, 287. Prephara ta ofd Neepits a cud, XXV, . Paphaomansta ais ofNmepaeie r XXV, 7. . Oýcurrence of Ic pialus thuje at Montreal, XXV, 297 and XXXIX, 397. The larger species of Argynnis and the mystery of their life history, XXVIII, 143. Preparatory stages of Erebia epipsodea. XXVII11, 274. Life history of Co1 ias iinter jor, XX IX, 249.e Life history of Xylina Belhunei, XXXIII, 1. What is a Genuý? XXXIV, 187. New Gortynas, XXXVII, 305 (with plate). A North Amuerican Entomologis' Union, XXXVIII, 1. Type and Typical, XL, 141. Recent work among the Borers, XL, 249. Notes on N. A. Graptas in the British Museurn, XIII, 418. The second International Congress of Entomology, XIAV, 3170. In the Annual Reports:- No. 23, p. 32. A Trip to Mt. %Vsshington. No. 32, p. 57. Faîl WVeb %Vorrns, with plate of 33 figures. , No. 32, p. 61. Notes on Danais archippus. No. 37, p. 39. A hunt for a borer. * No. 39, p. 145. Life history of Euchet jas oregonensis. l'{ No. 40, p. 46. Origin and diffusion of Entomological Errors.",
         "z4t) THE CAN..Z:.L ENTOMOLOGKST In 29th report, p. 17. President's Annual Address delivere(l on the occasion of the 25th Anniversary of the Montreal Brandi. In Entomological News, Vol. XVIII1, p. 420, is an able article on Thecia calanuts and T. edwardsii (with the footnote that it wa, read bcforc the Ent. Soc. of Ontario at Guelph, july 4, 1907). ln Vol. VII, 172. On occurrence of L'hionobas tarpeia in Northî America. Several short itcnîs also appear, including onc regarding~ E-rebia discoidalis in the first volume, p. 146. NEWV OR LITTLE KNOWN SPECIES 0F APHIDIDAS. DYv JOIIN J. DAVIS, BUREAU 0F ENTOMOLOGY, WVASHINGTON, D. C. (Coîîîinoed froni p. 173.) Symdobips aibasiphuis, ni. sp. This vcry interesting plant-bouse was flrst taken by the writei on white oak (Quercus aiba), at Elgin, Illinois, August 30, 1910. The past year (Sept. 10, 1913), the wingless females were fourni quite commun on white oak at Lafayette, Indiana, and October 8, 1913, at the same place, the wingless oviparous feniales and winged males wcre obscrvcd. ln ail cases the plant-louse was found on the Icaves near the leaf petiole, usuially on the under surface of the leaf, and invariably attendcd by the ant, Cremastogasler lineo/at,i Say.* W'c have found only the apterous forms ufthei viviparoti, gencration, but Mr; J. T. Moncil collected thirec wingcd individual, of this species on oak petioles at Mine la Motte, Missouri, june 28. 1890, and olîr description uf this form is taken front these speci- ins and the notes accompanyiîîg them, through the kindness 1,1 Mr. MonelI. 1 have reccntly received an oviparous femalc ut thi, species front Mr. A. C. Baker, accompanicd by the following note: \"On white oak, Vienna, Va., Oct. 4, 1912. Ants had bujît a mail nest over the aphids to protect them. This nest was on the appel side ut the Icaf, covering nearly haIt ut it.' The first, and su f,îî as wc arc aware, the only published reference to this species is lî \\ Dr. Thomas in the Eighth Report ut the State Entomologist \u003ci Illinois (1879, p. 118), where the apterous females are described a Lac/mus quercfolioe Fitch, fromn specimens collected on white o.îk *Kindly deternîined by Dr. %V. M. Wheeler. July, 11114 ýýlm",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 227 s. at Carbondale, Illinois, in August. As wili be readily noticed, this i, flot the species designated quercfoloe by Fitch. .vdbius, the species under consideration seems to Iîest belong Wîngtess viviParous.jemale: General colour. dark brown. Head and prothorax brownish ellow to light reddish brown; mcsothorax usually concoiorotis or b'ut slightly darker; mctathorax with a dark brown longitudinal trea on each side, the remaining areas greenishi brown; abdomen lark brown wîth irregular paler grcenishi brown areas, apparently lue to thc pale grecnish young within the bode' sometimes the inetathorax and entire abdomen shir.ng dark brown, alm(\u003est black. Blody sparsely clothed with Chailophoris-like Ilairs, more promin- vrit at posterior end. Eyes maroon colour. AntennSe scarcely more than one. hall lhe body length; aimost naked; segment 111 longest, and the fila- ient of VI shorter than the basa! portion of that segment; onlv' thie usual distal sensorja on V and base VI; segment I and Il îluskv, 111 and IV pale., with a barely noticeable duskiness at tip, V pale anrd dusky at tip. VI, base, with the basai half paie, the (listai hall anail of filament VI blackish (PI. XVIII, fig. 49). Beak pale vellow, the extrenie tip dusky; reaching to the coxie of the secon1 pair of legs. Two fore pairs of legs whitish, the joints often \u003clusky' aind the distal hall of tarsus blackish; hind pair blackish, excepting the distal half of'tlia, which is paler. In life the cornicles are nither conspicuous because of their pure white colour, as thoug I i )%ered with a heavy white pulverulence; quite small, the opening narrow; slightly cone-shaped, and inconspicuous, in mounte\u003cl ,pecimcns (PI. XVIII, fig. 50). Cauda a rather inc\u003c\u003enspicuoLi 'îinded protuherance, pale yellowish and hairy; anal plate bilobed, inoderately deeply emarginate and the lobes robust and hairy ,PI. XVIII. fig. 51). Measurements from six individu,îls in balsam; Length of bodY 1.I to, 1.9 mm., average 1.6 mm.; width 0.8 to 1.0, average 0.9 'ni.; antenna .1, 0.069; 11, 0.052; 111, 0.191 to 0.278, average 11U34; IV, 0.139 to 0.182, average 0.157; V, 0.157 to 0.191,",
         "228 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST average 0.174; VI, base, 0.113 ta 0.139, average 0.125; VI, fila~- * ment, 0.070 ta 0.087, average 0.080; total average length 0.891 min. WVinged viviparous female: Head (PI. XVIII, fig. 52) and thorax dark brown ta blackislh. Abdomen brown with a central longitudinal whitish yellow stripe. *Body very sparsely hairy, the tip of abdomen, including cauda and anal plate, more noticeably liairy. AntennSe shorter than body; relative antennal lcngths as in the apterous; segment 111 bearing 7 ta 8 rather large circular sensoria in a row, the usual distal one, on V and base VI (PI. XVIII, fig. 53). Wings hyaline, veins. narrow, an almost imperceptilble duskiness at tips of veins; ter- mninai l)ranch of media v'ariable, sometimes branching near ape\\, of wing and sometimes nearer ta the point where this vein rs.i branches. Cornicles whitis*, slightly narrower at tip than ai .tse, *about as long as broad and quite inconspicuous in mouinteO pcCi- mens. Cauda broadly roundcd and anal plate bilobed fi thu 'apterous fori (PI. XVIII, fig. 54). Measurenients frcm, three specimens in balsain, the bodje.. *somiewhat shrivelled. Average length of body 1.16 min.; averagr width 0.57 mmn.; length of wings approximately three timnes thdcr witlth; antenna 1, 0.06; I1, 0.05; 111, 0.261 ta 0.295, average * 0.278; IV, 0.156 ta 0.174, average 0.165; V, 0.182 ta 0.200, aver- age 0.191; VI, base, average 0.122; VI, filament 0.078 ta 0.096, average 0.087; average total length 0.953 mmn. Immature: The young is whitish green with pale olive green markings, a\u003e fullows: A U-shaped marking the bottoni of which extcnds ta andl usually includes the first abdominal segment and the top of whicl reaches the prothoracie segment. A longitudinal area on each sidt- of the abdomen and about in line with the cornicles, but not quitu reaching ta thein. Another marking just posterior ta the cornicle,. Cornicles white as in the adult. WVinged male: HeadI and thorax dark brown to I\u003eIackish. Abdomen pal. pea-green with a dorsal median longitudinal marking and an arco M",
         "CAN. E iqr ,Votý XLVI PLATE , 56' 50 54 52 n 49 5 57v 55 SYMDQ8[US ALBASIPHUS, n. p",
         "230 THE CANADIAN ENT0M0L0GIST around cach cornicle of a palcr grcen. Body with onlv a fem, sparscly-placcd hairs. Eyes dark red. Antennoe a little more than half the bodv length; relative Icngths of segments as in other forms: 1 and Il pale dusky, 111, IV, V and base of VI pale with blackish tips, and ail of VI filament black; segment 111 bearing 23 to 30 irregularly- placed circular sensoria, IV with 8 tu 13, V with 5 to 9, flot in- cluding the usual distal fine, and VI base with 2 to 4, usually iii a row, exclusive of the usual distal fines; sparscly liairy (PI. XVIII, fig. 55). Fore pair of legs pale, with the tip of tarsus blackish; middle pair similiarly coloured, but with the femur dusky towards the tip; bind pair with femur llackish except at base, tibia black- ish except towards tip, and apex of tarsus black. Wings as in the winge(l viviparous female (PI. XVIII, fig. 56). Cornicles as described for the other formâ. Cauda pale green, covered with a rather heavy pulverulence, hairy, and similar in shape to those of the other forms. Anal plate rounded (flot bilobed as in the viviparous forms) and bairy. Measurements from six individuals mounted in balsain, as follows: Length of body 1.32 to 1.82, average 1.51 mm.; width 0.46 to 0.58, average 0.54; length of wing, average 2.28 mmn.: width, average 0.82 mm.; antenna 1, 0.061; IU, 0.054; 111, 0.296 to 0.322, average 0.315; IV, 0.174 to 0.217, average 0.197; V, 0.200 to 0.235, average 0.217; VI, base, 0.122 to 0.148, average 0.138; VI, filament 0.087 to 0.104, average 0.092; total av'erage Iengtb 1.074. 11Vingless evipareas female: Body mottle(I with green and black, but to the naked eve it appears to I)e largeîy blackisb. Hea'l and first two thoracie seg- mients of a light reddish to pinkish tint; remainder of body bîack- ish, with a more or less distinct median dorsal line of pale yellowisx green or whitisb green, sometimes even with a faint pinkish tint. Laterad of the median paler area are dots of the same colour intermixcd witb the black; also a pale area around the cornicles. Body moderately sparsely clothed with medium-Iength bairs as in the wingless viviparous female. Eyes maroon red. Antennoe approximately one-haîf the Iength of the body; relative lengths of segments as in the other",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 231 s imS; Vet y sparseiy hairy; segmen t 1 concolorous with hcad, i1 paie %%ih a siight duskiness, 111, IV, V and base VI paie with biackisli tips, VI filament black; sensoria as in thc wingicss viviparous ic1ale (Pi. XVIII, fig. 5\"). Beak reaching to coxe of second pir of legs. Fore pair of legs entireiy paie, exccpting distai endl otarsus; middle pair with femur dusky te biackish except at base; !!i pair as the middle pair, but the tibia dusky exccpt at tip); 11111(1 tibiie noticeably swolicn and bearing many irreguiarly piaceci ciricular sensoria (Pi. XVIII, fig. 58). Cornicles white as iii oilier forms. Cauda paie witiî greenishi tint, anal plate rounded aii the maie. Measurements from six iiividuais, as follivs: Length (À body 1.6i3 to 2.01, average 1.81 mnî.; width 0.96 te 1.12, average 1.04 mm.; antenna 1, 0.069; I1, 0.069; 111, 0.269 te 0.313, aver- age 0.290; IV, 0. 148 to 0.200, average 0. 179; V, 0. 174 te 0.209), average 0.186; VI, base, 0.113 ta 0.139, average 0.130; VI, fila- ,k nient 0.070 te 0.090, average 0.078; total average iength 0.992 iii. Egg: Thec egg is very paie greenish when first laid, inter changing u, black. Aphis pseudobrassîe, ni. sp. This species was first received by us frorn Mr. W. J. Schocne, w ruw found occasionai specimens on calibage at Geneva, New York, i Jîris 15, 1912. Later in the year (Nov. 20, 1912), a correspondent seiir us specimens coiiected at Evansviile, Indiana, with the note irîri they were abundant on kale and mustard, and tiîat 'tliese i saîine insects have been bothering aur turnips and turaip greens' ut~roying large portions of te patches. It dues flot bother on .pr)ing greens, only on fahi crops.\" lat the lot receivcd from Evans- vlewere Myzus perticoe and Aphis pseiidobrassire in about equai Thrrîe past fail (September and October, 1913) we have found rti Lafayette, Indiana, abundant on r.îdislb and turnip anil iii ti, insectary it brel rather fr\u0026eivy on rapc2, althougi. the two form cr ,ucin te be the preferred host plants. Mr. F. B. Paddock has aise ftirrid it abundant on turnip at Coiiege Station, Texas, and has kimiIlv forwarde-j specimens te us. No dorîbt further collections .iij",
         "2:12 THE CANADIAN ENT0M0LOGIST w lshow t hi 'Ipe(-ies to be gellcral 1V dist rîlitCd over thei ColIot and silice it closely resenilies Aph'is brassice it lia, iikely beui i-itaken for this species in soume instances. 'rhc fact that the winged v'iiarous female huars sensoria nij segiment IV. of i lie antenna, alone separates it froni brassicoe. 11p sexes have flot heen found and our prcsent knowicdge Icads uis t, believe that the more tîsuai means of passing the winter isa viviparous femaies. 1l'ingless tiviParoatsfemale. (Fig. 21), Entire body paie whitish green, head siightly dusky. Aixi. mien with a longitudinal row of imipressed dots along cach side in line with thecoCrn- ides; aiso on each side of the mediair dorsal Une is a ru of transverse shiîr. ing areas witha reticuiated surf.mrv. those on the l\u003e four or five si ments usuall\\ united; and a sii ilar row of sinallh areas on eachi sidc. These shining ru ticulated arc.t, contrast with i, rest of the losk whicli is duil anti veruient. Thor, w segments %wilr suadiiiar trans%-vî,i areas. In speciinuii just miolted the entire body appears shining and reticuiated. Eyes black. Antennre biackish excepting segments 1-, Il aii basai haif of 111 which are pale; reaching a iittie beyond ii 1.",
         "-THE CANADIAN ENCrOMOLOIST. -.33 iniddile of the body; segment 11I I ongest, en aft three fouthslogerthn VI filament; segnients V and VI base w-ith tlie usual distal sensoria. Bcak reaching to coxL' \u003cf secondl pair of legs. Legs pale with dusky joints, the tips of the tihie and aIl of thc tarsi black. Cornicles pale with the tip dusky, slightly swollen towards the tip and constrictcd just bcforc the apcx, and noticably longer than the cornicles of A. brassica,. ('auda conical, and dusky to blackish. Measurcmeits, as follows (averages front six in\u003cHdiiwals): Length of bodly 1.66 mnm.; width 1.00 mmn. cornicle 0.226 mom.; cauda 0.140 mom.; antennal1,0.080; 1l, 0.061; 11!,0.399;IV0.202; V, 0.160; VI, base 0.122; VI, filament 0.287; total average length 1.311 Min. Pupa. Head dusky, remainder of body crearo colour or with .i faintT greenish tint, and covercd with a slight whitjsh pulveruilece, excepting the shining areas whicli arc eovered with a noticeable reticulation, and which are placed as follows-a row of oval or transverse areas on cach side of the median dorsal line and a row of smaller and more circular ones laterad of these on each s i(e, ab)out in line with the cornicles. Eyes black. Antenna. pale dusky, the distal ends of segments I)eing more so, relative lengths of segments as in the vtinged female. WViig pa\u003cls blackish. Legs pale dusky with the joins distal end of tibie and tarsus blackish. Cornicles dusky, paler at Midldle, blackish at til)s, and sirnilar iii shape to those of the 'ingless female. f Winged viviparousfemale. (Fig. 22). ( Head and thorax black. Abdomen pale apple green with a tint of nile green and a row of three black spots on each \u0026ide anterior to the cornicles; a row of small impressed dot-s on each side dorsad of the larger spots; and iii addition a few scattered...... inconspicuous dusky markings on the dorsum, and the last threc segments with black transverse, dorsal median markings. Eyes black. Antennoe black; almost reaching to base of cornicles; segments 111 and VI filament subequal; segment 111 with 19 to 26 moderately tuberculate circular sensoria irregularly placed,",
         "234 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. IV with 6 to 10, often more or less in a row, V and VI base with thc usual distal sensoria and flot infrequently segment V bearsone or two Ilear the base (Fig. 22a). Wings with black and rather conspicuous veins, and the terminal branch of the media nearer the a Fi. 22.- %ph, e, dorur Wn VvParoU. felu fe; a. an tenni o! a rne. eniarzedl; b. cornicie of saine, enlarge,1. apex of wing than where it first branches. Legs with femur pale brownish to blackish, tibia pale brownish with tip black and tarstis black, Cornicles dusky, paler at tips, and shaped as ini the m-ingless formi (Fig. 22b). Cauda concolorous with the abdomen or paler. Measurements as follows (averages from six individuals): Length of body 1.4 mm.; width of body 0.66 mm.; length of wing 2.4 mmn.; width of wing 0.9 mm.; antenna 1, 0.069; I1, 0.061; 111, 0.363; IV, 0.191; V, 0.165; VI, base 0 126; VI, filament 0.358; total average lengtb 1.3.33 mm.; lengtb of cornicles 0.172 mm.; of cauda 0.134 mm. D)escriptions made from specimens collected on radish, turnip, and fape, at Lafayette, Indiana. M",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMtOLOGÎST 235 DJIRECTIONS FOR SîENoî,«( LiviN, Aeiiis. It is desirable, in secdîng aphids for determnination, that li\\inîg individUals be submitted when possible. XVe have found die. following method to be the moust satiSfaCtory of scveral tried: Place a Portion of the Plant bearing tlîe aphids in a glass \\iil and with it a strip of filter \u003e \"per, the si7C depending on the ,*ze of vial and quantitv of foliage placed within it. Th'Ie vial is iien tightly stoppereti with a cork ;Lnd placed in a mailing tube ,r substantial box fur mailing. Always have tîte stenm of the plant anîd the end of the filter paper suffciently long so that thev w~ill s, field k' the cork; otherwise the loose foliage and twigs Mwill ~,ke about and may crush the aphîds. B\u003e' this method we liae shipped living specimens 1,700 muiles and had them reach ilicir destinati-mn iii excellent shape. Tin salve boxes also inake e\\iclient shipping boxes for living aphids. Shipments \u003cof this nature siîîuld aîways be accompanied b\u003e' full data, such as namne of foode 1,lant, Iocality, date, part of Plant affccted, and collector. AIl of the illustrations in this paix r are by Dr. Henry Fox, v\\i'epting figures 10, 21, and 22, which are by Mr. \\V. R. Waîton i figures 43 and 45 to 48 inclusive of plIate VII and aIl of plate XVII11, which are the author's. EXPLANATION OF IIATE'S. 4 Plate Il. Alacrosipzum creelii n. ip.-Figure 1 anteonna, and 2 i iruîicîe of wingîess viviparous female; 3 head and 4 antenna oif i rged viviparous iemale. .1tacrosiphum coryli n. sp.-5 heal, 6 antenina andl 7 cauîla i îî ingless viviparous feniale; 8 antenna, 9 wing, and 10 cornicle t, îînged viviparoîls female. Plate IV. 1lJacrosip/zum vena'fiscce n. sp. Il hicad, 12 iuilvnna and 13 cauda of wingless viviparous female, 14 head, 15 a'tinna, 16 wing, and 17 cornicle of winged vîviparous female;i 11, antenna of winged male; 19 antenna anîl 20 hind tibia of s rîgless oviparotîs female. Plate V. Mlacrosiphum tilioe MoneIl. 21 head, 22 antenna 'iid 23 cornicle of wingîess v'iviparous female; 24 antenna oif ý%iîiged male; 25 hind tibia of wingîess oviparous female.",
         "2:36 THE CANADIAN ENT0MOL0GIST 14yzus lycopersici Clarlce.--26 antenna of wîngiess viviparoo, femiale; 27 antenna, 28 head, 29 corniCie and 30 caLida of winged( viviparoLls fcniale; 31 antenn4t of winged male; 32 antenna (\u003eJ oviparous female. Plate VII. Myzus lycopersici Clarke.-33 hind tibia i' %vîngless ov'iparous feniaic. R/wpalosiphtum houvrdii Wison.-34 antenna of wingles, viviparous female; 35 heacl, 36 Wing, 37 cornicle, 38 cauda antl 39 antenna of winged viviparous female; 40 antcnna of winged malt, Eulachnits rileyi Williams.-41 antenna o)f wingless xvvparou, femiale; 42 head, 43 antenna, 44 lîeak, 45 wilsg and 46 hind tarse., of mwinged viviparous female; 47 antenna of winged maie, 48 hinîl tibia oif wingless oviparous female. Plate XVIII. Symdobius albasiphus n. sp.-49 antenna, 50i cornicle and 51 cauda and, anal plate of wingless viviparous femalc: 52 head, 53 antenna and 54 cauda and anal plate of wingeîl viviparous female; 55 antenna and 56 wing of winged maie; 57 antenna and 58 hind tibia of wingless oviparous female. REPORT ON A COLLECTION 0F JAPANESE CRANE- FIES (TJPULIDýE, DIPTERA). DtY CHARLES P. ALEXANDER, ITHACA, N.Y. (Coniuct fr,)ni 1). 211.) Tipula nîpponensîs, sp. n. Head vellowish; thorax yellow with brown stripes; abdonivii -with thc caudal margin of the segments broadly brown; wing, variegated gray, brown and hyaline. Maie: Length 12.8mm.; wing l3.Gmmi.: tntennteal)out4 ii Fernale: Length 13-14.1 min.; wing 14.2-15.2 mnm. MaIe: Paipi brown, the terminal segment very long and pal,~ frontal prolongation of the head very short and stout, yelloIw isli antennaw, segments I and 2 yellow, ilageliar segments with th,- somewhat enlarged base dark brown, the remainder of each se, ment duil yellow; front, vertex and occiput dul yeilow, the sid, of the vertex and the genie dark brown. Pronotum pale; mesonotum dulI yeliow with dark bruit i stripes, the mediaîî one biserted by a paie line, lateral stripes shuîi J.tlv. 1914 M",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 237 very close to the median ,tripe; scutum with the lobes brown; scutellum and postnotum yellowish medially, the sides dark l)rown, a narrow indistinct median fine. Pleura yellowishwith brown blotches as follows: On sides of the propleura; a large blotch on the meso- episternum and mesosternum; a very dark spot on the dorso- cephalic angle of the mesepimerum, a dark blotch at the base o)f the halteres. Halteres palcr. Legs,, coxoe dui yellow with the base on the outer aide tinged with brown; trochanters yellow; femora yellow, the tip brown; tihiae light brown, tarsi dark l\u003erown. Wings with a light gray suffusion, celîs C and Sc a little lighter, y'ellowish; stigma brown; hyaline spots as follows: In front of anal beyond the stigma, cell lst M2, a large blotch in the end o\u003ef cel! M andl a spot in cil lot A near thc end of vein 2nd A; veins Cu and 2nd A narrowly seamed with brownjsh. Venation (see plate XVI, figure 2). Abdominal tergites with the basal third yellowish, apical two- tlîîrds brown; pleurail une conspicuously dark brown; sternites light vellow, each segment with a narrow, transverse subbasal brown band. MaIe hypopygium: 9th tergite from above narrow, îlot nearly as wide as the 8th tergite. its lateral angles rounded, its caudal margin deeply and broadly notched. Pleural append- ages from the aide (see plate XIX, fig. 2). A more dorsal and ectal fleshy lobe which is directeal backward, this lobe cylindrical, tdpering, provideal wbth sparse long hairs; entad andl ventrad of this lobe is a large bifid appendage whose caudal arm is feebly ' chitiiiized, pale, wbth abundant hairs, the inner or cephalic arm i r chitiabzed, and with strong teeth which approach the caudal margin of the 9th tergite. Penis with the central vesicle large, ifs convex side directerl dorsad, the penis proper, long and slender. a Female.-Almoet as in the e?, the antenn:e shorter; oviposi- tor with the tergal valves much more slender than the high sternal valves. Holotype, c?', Tokyo, japan; April 26, 1912 (Vial 25). Allotype, 9, Tokyo, japan; April 26, 1912 (Vial 25). Paratype 9 Tokyo, japan; April 26, 1912 (Vial 25). Tîpula serrîcauda, sp. n. Head v4th a brown median stripe; thorax with three brown stripes; abdomen trivittate with brown; female ovipositor wbth the -J",
         "238 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST sternal valves exceedingly short, tergal valves long, scrrated on ti, outer margin; wings clouded brown, gray and hyaline. Fcmale.-Lengih about 23 mm.; wing 18-18,8 nsm. Female-Palpi with the base dark, the apical segments pale; frontal prolongation of the head rather short, dark above, paleý bcneath; antennoe, four basai ségnients light yellow, the remaining segments a little brown at the base, yellow apically; front, vertex andi occiput duli vcllow, the hcad with an elongate hrnwn median stripe, Mesonotal prirecutum light brown, with three broad dark brown stripes of which the median one is very broad and i l)isectcd by a pale line, lateral stripes close to the miedian one, scutumr (lulI brownish yellow, the lobes mostly dark brown; scutellum brownish yellow; postnotum light brown, with theýt- (lark browri longitudinal stripes. Pleura brown, mucîs darker on the mesosterna. Haltereà rather short, dulI yellow, the knob ii little brown. Legs, coxie with the externo-cephalic face brown; trochanters dulI yellow, femora and tibite yellow, the tips brown:; tarsal segment 1 brownish yellow. brown at the tip; segments 2-5 brown. Wings gray, celîs C and Sc yellowish brown; dark browii blotches as foflows; At base of vein M, in middle of celI Mi ad- joining vein Cu, at origin of Rs, stignial region including tiîu cephalic portion of the cord. Hyaline blotches scattered over tite wing, the largest beyond the stigma, extending obliquely across the wing to cl ilst M2; a large blotch in celîs R and M near tlhe basal third, another in celi M near the tip; others before the stigma and in the anal celîs. Venation (see plate XVI, fig. 4). Abdominal tergites brownish yellow, with three indistinct dark brown longitudinal stripes which extend the length of the abdomen. Ovipositor of a remarkable structure; viewed from beneath (s(t t plate XIX, fig. 6), the sternal valves are remarkabiy short, it even attaining the hase of the upper valves;. upper valves parailel on a horizontal plane, slightly curved, the inner margin smooth. the outer margin with numerous saw-iike teeth. Sternites (ill yeilow, a broad brown longitudinal median stripe rather indistin ( on segments 1-3 but becoming darker and better defined on tie apical segments. Holotype, 9, Tokyo, japan; Auguet, 1912; viai 41. Paratype, 9 , Tokyo, japan; August, 1912; vial 41. mu",
         "CAN. ENr , VOL. XLVI. JAPANUE PLATE Mr. /i ýE CRANE-FLlES,",
         "240 THE CANADIAN ENTOM0LOGIST. Tîpula yusou, sp. n. Head and thorax blackish; postnotum blackish; abdomen yellow with three dorsal- brown longitudinal lines and one mediain stripe; wings pale greyish brown variegated with hyaline. Maie: lcngth 15 mm.; wing 19.2 mm.; antennS 4-5 mm. Female: length 23 mm.; wing 21 mm. Maie: Palpi and frontal prolongation of the head dark brown, the latter very long; antennTe, segment 1 very long; scapal seg- ments yellow, segment 3 yellow hasally darkening into brown ai the tip, remaining segments dark brown, the enlarged base eveli darker, front, vertex and occiput dark hrown. Pronotum dulI yellowish brown. Mesonotal proescutum light brown with three darker brown stripes of which the median one i *elongate cunciform, its narrowed point ending just before tht *suture; scutal lobes dark 'brown; scultellum dulI yellow with ail indistinct, narrow darker line; postnotum dark brown. Pleuraî dark brown. Halteres pale, the stem browner before the knob. Legs, coxie brown on the outer face, the tips yellow; trochanter, yellow; femora yellow, hecoming brown at the tip; tibiae and tarsi brown. Wings, basal hall pale yellowish, apical half more brown, cells C and Se yellowish; stigmal blotch darker hrown, irregular; hyaline blotches as follows: a large blotch across the wing before the cord; a narrower one bcyond the cord; a large blotch in the *caudal portions of celîs lst A and 2nd A; celI M pale in the middle. Venation, see plate XVI, figure 1. Abdominal tergites 1-7 dulI yellow with a narrow dark browîî median stripe; segments 3-7 with a shorter and narrower stripu near the lateral margin of each sclerite; segments 8-9 dark brown; *sternites dull yellow, also with a distinct, narrow median vitt.. Maie hypopygium (Lateral aspect, see plate XIX, figure 1): 9th tergite from above, with the caudal margin deeply and broadl% rourded, the edge with abundant chitinized teeth, the lateral angles notched; 8th sternite, viewed from the side triangular, the caudP! end with a dense bunch of orange coloured hairs; 9th ster- nite rather large, oval, bearing on its pleural region a group 01 appendages as follows: the more dorsal a large, fleshy, sigmoid lobe, very densely clothed with long delicate hairs, ventrad andi entad of this a large bifid appendage whose caudal branch ends iiu N.",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST 241 a cylindrical chitinized arm, and whose cephalic branch is produced dorsad into a spoon.shaped appendage whosc concavity is directed toward the chitinized portion of the 9th tergite; cntad of these appendages is a large lobe whose point is chitinized and directed cephalad, the sides with deep paralîci grooves. The penis is rather short and very stout; just underneath its tip inside the pleura are a pair of apophyses (shown in the figure), thesrt strongly chitinized and ending in two sharp spines of which the caudal one is the larger. Female.-Like the el, but the dorsal abdominal stripe is much broader, lateral stripes also much broader; on the caudal half of the 7th tergite and on the 8th tergite, ail threc of the dorsal vittit unite and cover the segment; the sternal vitta is very broad, but is interrupteci at the end of the 6th segment; segments 7 and 8 with a small brown ngedian spot near the caudal margin, and the anterior and posterior edges of the sclerite a littie darker; genital segment duil yellow. Holotype, el, Tokyo, japan; May 7, 1912; vial 36. P Allotype, 9, Tokyo, japan; April 26, 1912; vial 21. Paratypes, 2 9, Tokyo, japan; April 23, 1912; vial 3. The specific name is that of an aboriginal japanese race for- merly occupying the north-west shores of the southern half of Nippon facing the Sea of Japan. EXPLANATION 0F PLATES. PLATE XI. Fig. 1. Wing of Pachyrhina Pulleta, sp. n. Fig. 2. P. palloris Coqluillett. Fig. 3. P. repanda, Sp. n. Fig. 4. P. virgala Coquillett Fig. 5. P. flavonota, sp. n. Fig. 6. Dorsal aspect, 9th tergite, of P. flavonota, sp. n.; dl. Fig. 7. P. 1 ul~ sp. n.,? Fig. 8.P. rpiaa, sp. n.; c?. Fig. 8. P.lrI Cqulet; Fig. 9. l.t ntna sget Fig.P. virgata Coquillett; ?. Fig. 11. P eadsp. n.; c?. Fig. 12 .P . pauiata, sp. n.; c?.",
         "242 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST Fig. 13. Pleural appendages, e? hypopyguim, P. virgata * CoqLlillett. Fig. 14. Pleural aplicndages, e? hypopygiumn, P. Pullata, sp. n. Fig. 15. P. flavonota, sp. n. Fig. 16. P. repanda, sp. ii. PL.ATE XVI. Fig. 1. Fig. 2. Fig. 3. Fig 4. Fig. 5. Fig. 6. Fig. 7. Fig. 8. Fig. 1. Figz. 2. Wing of Tipula yusou, sp. n. T. nipponensis, sp. n. T. aino, sp. n. T. serricauda, sp. n. T. yamala, sp. nl. T. insulicola, sp. n. T. toquilleili Enderlein. Dictenzidia fasciata Coquillett PLATE XIX. HYPOpygium of Tipula vusou, sp. n. Lateral aspect; t = 9th tergite; pl = pleura. Hypopygium of T. nippnnensis, sp. n. Lateral aspect; t = 9th tergite. Fig. 3. Hypopygitum of T. yamata, sp. n. Lateral aspect; t = 9th tergite. Fig. 4. Hypopygium of T. aine, sp. n. Dorsal aspect of the 9th tergite. Fig. 5. Hypopygium of T'. aine, sp. n. Pleural appendages, lateral aspect. Fig. 6. Ovipositor of T. serricauda, sp. ci. Ventral aspect; t = tergal valve; 5 = sternal valve. Fig. 7. Hypopygium ut T. coquilietti End. Ventral aspect; 8s - 8th sternite;- 9s = 9th sternite. Fig. 8. Hypopygium of T coquilleili End.; 9th tergite f ran above. Fig. 9. Hypopygium of T. coquilletti End.; pleural appendag' from the inside. Fig. 10. Hypopygium of T. coquiliui End.; pleura and ii appendage from the outside. m.",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 243 A REVIEW.OF THE WORK ON THE POISONED B3AIT SPRAY, DRY METHOD AND MIXED TREATMENT 0F CONTROLLING, FRUIT FIES (TRYPETIDS). DY HFNRY H. P. SEr'ERIN, PH. D., MILWAUKEE, WIS. As the work on the poisoned bait spray for controlling fruit) flies is in its infancy in the United States and beyond the experi- mental stage in other countries, wc have decided to review som of this work in order to set forth some of the methods employed and results obtained. In this paper we shali take Up the work of the South African, French, Mexican, United States and Canadjan entomologists, and ]eave the results obtajned by the Italian entomologists for a future paper. It is a well-known fact that fruit Hlies, after they issue from the pupie, require 10 days or more before the egg-laving period l\u003eegins. This interval is a feeding period, and the flies subsist on the nectar of Hlowers, waxy coating of fruit, juices of injured or cracked fruit hanging on the trees, windfalls, fallen infested fruit and droplets of water. Many fruit-Hlies show a great fondness for sweets, and one can readily understand why poisoned sweets are so effective in their control. If this poisoned bait is available with the first appearance of the Hlies on the wing, Do dcubt large num- bers would be killed before the egg-Iaying period commences. Medlterranean Fruit Fly (Ceratitis capitala Wied.). Mally (11) of South Africa, apparently unaware of the work f of the Italian entomologists started in 1903, began in the season of 1904-5 to spray with poisoned molasses to, control the Mediter- ranean fruit Hly, but his experiments were nullified by the scarcity of the Hlies. Mally's successor, Dewar (4), continued these experi- nilents during the seasons of 1905-7. His resuits were not conclu. sive, I)ut they were most encouraging. It was not until the sea- son of 1908-9 that Mally (14) gave a decisive demonstraiion of the success of the poisoned molasses to combat the Mediterranean fruit fly under South African conditions. \"A severe outbreak of the pest in a commercial peach orchard was brought to a sudden and practically complete haIt, and the fruit maturing later was inarketed under the guarantee of freedom f rom maggots,\" whi!e the inifestation of the fruit on the control treesincreased until practi- cally every frvit was involved. J.1y, 1914",
         "244 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST Fuller (5) in 1909-10, tested the poisoned hait spray to, con- trol the Mediterranean fruit fly, and ail trials which were made iii several citrus orchards to control this pcst were \"attcnded witli remarkable effects.\" In 1912, Lounsbary (9) dcmonstrated the applicability of thf poisoned hait spray to, town conditions. His workc was carricd ou undcr the most unfavourable wcather conditions, for rain felu on 2:3 of the 33 days of experimentation. ihe garden in which the ex- periment was performed contained 15 varieties of fruit, and, thi. author states, \"there is probably no other garden in Pretoria wherc the fly flnds conditions more favourable for its welfare.\" TIhe windfalls f rom three untreated trees showed respectively: 95 11, 954 and 984% of maggoty fruit, against an average of 29% froin the treated trees, although the distance between the baited and unbaited ones was only about 150 yards. The fruit picked front sprayed trees showed that 13% was infested, whereas practicall every ripe fruit was maggoty on the untreated trees. The author concludes, therefore, that if the spraying is properly carried out the remedy is applicable under town conditions even where thv summer rainfall is heavy. The following formulas were used by these South Africain entomologists: TABLE 1. 1504.5 19115-7 ilûfi9 5 If! M .t........1. .... 5 7 18 B-o,, fugo, (th.)........ 32q; Ar..,,oî of Ieod Olb.). I 1 1 Postf a,..te f ],.d (...) ... t 3 f Water (gati.) .... 25 25 25 Water (gait.) ........5 4 t8 The lead arsenate and molasses or brown sugar in A of thesc formulas were simply dissolved in the required amount of cold water. According to Mally (13), the solution must be kept thoroughly agitated, so that the hait will remain of unifori strength. The spray should be applied so that the minute drop- lets faîl over and through the trees. A pint co a pint-and-a-halt is suflicient for a good-sized ten-year-old peach or nectarine trec. Ramn will uissqIlve and wash off the sweet ingredient, and the hait ishould be rçnewed as soon as the weather permits. The number of applications of the spray will vary according to local conditioni, and the season. The firit application should be made a montii hefore the presence osf the maggots in the fruit is ordinarily ex- pected, and after that an application after the expiration of everv, M dh 244",
         "R 5A THE CANADIAN ENT0M0LOGIST 245 10-14 days is thought advisable. EXperience alone will enable US to determnine the minimum number of applications necessary to insure good results. In the Hawaiian Islands we also obtained gond results with the use of the poisoned hait spray to control the Mediterranean fruit fly, even though our experiments were conducted under the most unfavourable weathcr conditions,. In our work, Mally's last for- mula (Table 1, 1909), was adopted, but with this difference: Mally used 3 ounces of lead arsenate, and we increased the amount to 5 ounces. To check up the effectiveness of the fruit fly remedy in our work 10 kerosene traps were wired in fruit trees located in different parts of a non-isolated orchard containing about 400 trees. The total number of fruit flues captured in these traps in live weeks was 10,239; of this number 10,203 were males and only 36 were females. With the kerosene traps kept in the same trees, the 400 fruit trees were sprayed about once a week during the following five weeks. The total number of fruit fles captured in the nil traps in five weeks during and after spraying was 182, of which 93 were caught during the first six days. After five applications nf the hait, it required a tllorough search to flnd an infested fruit in the orchard, wllereas before spraying almost every ripe fruit had been \"stung\" \u0026y the pest. Melon Fly or Bitter Gourd Fruit FIy (Dacus ciicurbuloe Coq.). Marsh (15) tested the poisoned hait spray to control the melon fly in the Hawaiian Islands. His baits were prebared by sweetening water' with molasses and adding arsen,3te of lead or Paris green to the solution. -The following proportions of the ingredients were used: Mol:ý.. .. ..l.t ... .. . .............. 1 % .1 In the experiment with Paris green the applications were made daily, from September 9 until October 14. \"Neither the experi- ment with arsenate of lead or with Paris green proved effective. The flues were frequently observed feeding on the poisoned liquids, but evidently did not relish them, and so failed to consume a fatal dose.\" Fuller (5) statinned in Natal, South Africa, used the poisoned liait spray to control the melon fly. He writes: \"Where the treat-",
         "246 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOL0GIST. ment bas lîcen applied for the melon fly whicb attacks S-(Itashe. marrows, pumpkins and the like, it lias prov'ed successfuil. Wec also attellipte(l to control the mielon fiy with the pois\u003cmnvd hait spray in the Hawaiian Islands. The sanie formula of tIi liait which wc used to control the Mediterranean fruit fly w.i. adopte(l to comibat thc mielon 14,, except that 1 ounice of a solublv poison, such as potassium arsenate or sodium arsenite, was a\u003cl(lc to tlic solution. As the melon tiy feeds duriîig the early mrniî hours the insecticide was applied sbortly after sunrise to aIl of the- foliage witlîin a puhipkin patch, and also to the vegetation boi- dering the samne. The results obtained after spraying werc ratlici striking. Before spraying thousands of melon flics could lie fourni resting on the lowcr surface of the Icaves, but several days after spraying only here and there could a specimen lic found. In ail probability these living fliés had rccently emerged from puparia, or came in from the feeding grounds orfrom surroundingcucurbit field. A few days after the application of the first spray ail of tiv infested pumpkin vines were pulled out of the ground and raked together in piles. Tlîe infested punîpkins were scattered withiin these piles and then ail was burned. To determine whether the melon flues coming f rom their fec'l- ing grounds or froni surrounding fields of cucurbits could be con- trolled, watermelon seeds were planted in a field adjacent to thc former pumpkin patch. The seeds sprouted before we wcre alu to make «a vigorolis campaign in surrounding cucurbit fields. 'lhiî watermelon plants were sprayed, but the frequent rains washed oit the thin film of sugar and lef t the plants subject to, the attack, of the pests coming froni outside sources. As soon as the weather became settled a fresh application of the lhait was madIeu tlîe watermelon plants and surrounding vegetation, but the tender stems of some of the watermelon plants were already infesteti Whether the pest, whîch has been allowed to increase unmolestei during the past sixteen years, can be controlled under Hawaiiiatî conditions, when one individual sprays and bis neigbbours do0 noi is problematical. In aIl probability better results could be oi, tained witb tbe poisoned hait spray in a well-isolated cucurbit field away fmmr tbe valicys, wbere rains are less frequent during titt summer montbs. (To tic continued\u003e. Mil",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST 247 NOTES ON THE W~INTER ANI) EARLY SPRING COIE-i) TERA OP FLORI DA WITH DESCRIPTIONS 0F NEW SPEÇIES. I\u003cY %%. S. IiLATCHLEY, INI)IANAPOL'., END. ((ontinmrd froni page 141.) 8196. Rhlnomacer plosusiLec. ()riginally descrilîed frnml Lake Supcrior, Virginia and California, this wcevil has since heen rccorded frorn as fur south as Agricultural College, Mississilpîi. A single spccimen was beaten from pine at Duinedlin, Januarý, 29. lu his characterization of the family Rhinoinaceride Leconte states that thc first joint of the antenne is \"a little stouter than the secondi but flot longer.\" Ini the D)unedin specimn i is at least one-haîf longer. 8205.-Eugnamptu8 striatus Lec. A \u003clozen or niort' werce lieaten from oak at D)unedin and Ormond. March 19 April 14. 8223-Pterocolus ovatus Fat). This prcuty littie weevil was also beaten from oak at Dunedin, Eustis, Sanford and Orniond. March 19 April 14, ten specimens having been secured. 8310.-Pachnoeus dîstans Horn. Four examples, taken at (\u003ermond on April 11-14, range from 10 tu 14 mm. iii length. Horn, in his original description, gives the length as 8 mom. 8340.-Eudlagogus pulcher Fab. At Sanford, on January 13, several hundred of this handsome weevil were found liiher- f î.iting beneath the bark of a pine log which 1a3' by the side \u003cf a ditch of running water along the edge of a truck patch. It appears to be a common species throughout the Stage. lO.814-Apion llvldumn Smith. Quite common on the dead vines of the wild cucumber (Melothria) and in dense masses of Spanish moss at Pelican Bay, Lake Okeechobee. A small reddish- vellow species which at first sight is hiable to be taken for an A1 nthonomus. lO,S29-Hyperodes (Macrops) hornil Dietz. Beneath boards, along the margins of a shallrîw fresh-water lake just back of Dunedin, this species and IL anthracinus Dietz, were taken mn aimbers. With thema were also, several other species of Lu.sronotis anîd Hyperodes as x'et unidentified. IL. hornii wals aiso, found at ()rmond and Lake Istokpoga. Januarv 21-April 14. J.1y, 1914",
         "Z46 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOG!ST. Llius lupinues p. nlov. Elongate, cylindrical, robust. Black, shining, evenly and rather thickly clothed with a fine, prostrate, gray pubescence which, on the sides of thorax and elytra, is condensed into a broad, proini- nent niarg:nal stripe. Beak short (2.3 mm. from eye to tip), stout, cylindrical, coarsely, closely and deeply punctate and with a fine but distinct carina reaching three-fourths to tip. Antenna: inserted one-third from tip, the second and third joints of funiculus subequal, the two together slightly longer than the first. Thorax as long as h~ide, sides parallel from base to mniddle, thence gradualý converging to apex, the latter feebly bisinuate; disc with numerous. very coarse shallow punctures, somewhat irregularly placed, their intervals finely reticulate-punctate, without mnedian impresscd line but with a broad shallow depression in front of scutellum and a fine carmna on apical third' Elytra three times longer than thorax an\u003cl one-fourth wider at base, sides parallel for three-fourths their length, thence feebly diverging into a rounded apex; disc with a large shallow concavity behind the scutellum and with regular unimpressed rows of rather large distant punctures, their intervals finely granulate-punctate. Abdomen densely pubescent, finely and densely punctate, with numerous scattered very coarse pun(- tures. Length 11-13 mm.; width 3.5-ý4 mm. Seven specimens beaten singly f rom the flcrwers of the hoar% lupine (Lu pinus diffusus Nutt.) near Dunedin between January 24 and March 18. Resembles placidus Lec. but that species bas thv first and second joints of funiculus equal and the thorax channeleul for two-thirds its length. In fresh specimens of lupinus the pubescence of beak, thorax and elytra is so dense as to almout conceal the surface sculpture. 1 had at first thought this a Cleonus but as 1 arn unable from the literature to clearly distinguish t1w differences between Cleonus and Lixus 1 sent it to Washington. Mr. Schwarz pronounced it a Lixus and wrote: \"No oneha hitherto been able to point out any generic differences betwecti Lixus and Cleonus but they differ in habitus and mode of life.\" 10,845.-Lius amplexus Casey. Quite frequent near Sarasota on the flowers of the large thistle Carduus horridulus Pursh. Feb. 13-27. M",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. 249 Lliua leptosomus sp. nov. Elongate, cylindrical, very siender. Black, shining, very sparsely clothed with fine gray pubescence except alnng the sides of the thorax and elytra, where it forms a narrow but conspicuous stripe; antennae and tarsi reddish brown. Beak short, stout, cylindrical, densely and finely reticulate-punctatc, feebly carinate. Antennie inserted at middle of heak, the first joint of funiculus stouter but subequal in length to second which is one-haif longer than third. Thorax cylindrical, one-fourth longer than wide, base and apex truncate, dise without smooth median line or basai impression, coarsely and sparsely punctate, the intervals with vcry fine sparse punctures. Elytra at base flot wider than thorax, two and one-third times as long, sides parallel for four-fifths their Iength, thence gradually converging to a subacute apex; dise with rows of smali distant punctures, the intervals very finely and sparsely punctate. Abdomen densely pubescent, finely and sparsely punctate. Length 7 mm.; wîdth 2 mm. One specimen swept from low herbage along the border of a cypress swamp. Sanford, April 9. The only other described species to which it appears to be closely allied is L. tenellus Casey, from which it differs in the relative Iength of antennal joints, in the beak being densely instead of 'extremely sparsely\" punctate and in the relatively longer thorax and greater length of body. ll,029.-Neomnastix punctulatus Dietz. Quite frequent on F the flowers of the Ericad, .4ndromeda nitUda Bart., at Dunedin, Sanford and Orniond. January 19--April 15. 8684.-Prlonomerus calceatue Say. One example of thîs common northern weevil was taken at Lake Istokpoga February 29. 1 do flot find it mentioned in any Florida list. 87l9.-Conotrachelus aratus Germ. Two specimens were beaten from oak, one at Dunedin, March 28; the other at Sanford, April 4. 8724.-Conotrachelus beifragel Lec. 0f this, the most handsome of the genus, a single example was beaten f rom pine at Eustis, April 6th. It was described from one specimen taken in 'lexas by Belfrage.",
         "zau THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST 8774.-Acalles ventrosus Lcc. QLÎitc common heneaih boards along the margin of frcsh-water lakcs near Dunedin anil Kissirnmee. January 18-March 19. Tyloderma punctata Casey. Very coMmon with the preccding; also at Sarasota and Ormond. Mating in Februar% an(I March. Vcry' distinct-from 1'. oereum Say with which it i usuallv confounded. A single specimen of the latter was taken ait Lake Okeechobee. 8797. Cryptorhyncus apiculatus GvlI. A single examplu of this rare speciCs was taken at D)unedin january 20; ilso froin the border of a lakc. 8821. Tachygonus lecontel Gyli. One of these cIiriou\u003e littie weev ils was bcaten froni oak at Ormond. April 1.5. 8826.-Craponlus Inoequalis Say. Quitc frequent ai Dunedin, Eustis and Orinond. Jantiary 23-April 13. Beateti from the wax-rnyrtlc or bayberry 11, 110-Baris oeneomlcans Casev. Frequent at Dunedin; also taken on Sanibel Island and at Kissimmee. Occurs in lom rnoist meadows. 8907-Madarellus undulatus Say. One specimen froiii Utopia, east shore of Lake Okeechobee. , The thorax is much mor, coarsely punctate than in those from Indiana. 8978. Rhodoboeus tredecimpunctatus qulnquepunc- tatus Say. One taken by sweeping ait Sanford. April 9. Schwarz records it as occurring on thistle flowers. The elytra are whoIIk black except a narrow reddislh stripe along each side margin. Tliv central spot of thorax is large, fusiform, reaches almost to apex, and in the Sanford specimen unites at base with the two hinder lateral spots which are obliquely merged along the base. It is ýi distinct southern colour variety. which in my opinion should he kept in the lists. 8983.-Sphenophorus lnoequalls Say. Single specimen. wcre taken at St. Petersburgh and Eustis beneath cover in Iow damp soil. january 20-April 7. 9002. Sphenophorus retusus GylI. One ait Dunedini. january 16. 11,215.-Sphenophorus minîmus Hart. One at Dunedini, I.",
         "THE CANADIAN E'NTOMOLOG.ST 25 1 Fcbruary 7. TIhis is (juite frequent iii low sanclv 1ocalities iii Indiana. 1)09.-Gononotus luto8us Lcc. Eigllt speCiîmeIS Wercfournij lieneath drift along the 1beach of ('learw atr Bay at D)unedin. January 21-February 8. A NATIONAL COLLECTION OiF CANAI)IAN INSECTS. The Sccrctary of State, with the concuîrrence of the Ninister of Agriculture, bas appointed the D)ominion Entoniologist. D)r. C. Gocrdoin Hewitt, Honorary Curator oif Entomology in the Canadian National Museum, Ottawa. For a numiier of years the Fntornological Branch oif the D)e- partmcnt of Agriculture has heen laving the' foundation of al reprc. sentative collection (of the insects of Canada. This collection, tozethcr with sevcral collections which have been acquired by the Museum, Co'lstitute the basis of a National CollcCtion. Ini it will e incorporate(l the insects collected and rcceivcd by he Ento - inological Brancli and by the Museun. As the National Museunm is under the direction of the I)irector of the Geological Survcy and l)eputy Minister of Mines, increased facilities will be affor\u003cled for sucuring entomological collections made hy surveying and exploring parties, for example, the Canadian (Stefansson\u003e Arctic Expeditioiî is collecting insects for the Nationîal Collection. The collections will be stored in cabinets similar to those 110w in use in the United States National Museum at Washington, and it will be a great satisfaction to Canadian entomologists to know that the collections will be housed m-a fire-proof building. It is hoped that this im- portant move in the interests of Canadian entomology will receive the support of collectors throughout the country. Collectors hav- ing duplîcate material will greatly assist in building up the collec- Tions by sending such extra specimens of local insc.?t as they may ]le able to spare for inclusion in the National Collection. Especi- ally is it to be desired that types of Canadian species shall Le leposited in the National Museum, where they will Le properly cired for. The Entomological Branch of the Department of Agriculture w ill continue-its practice of naming insects for collectors, and such collections and. . nec relating to the same should be addressed to \"The Dominion Entomologist, Ottawa.\"",
         "THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. ArvERICAN TRICHOPTERA-NOTES AND DESCRIPTIONS. BY NATHAN BlANKS, EAST FALLS CHURCH, VA. (Centinued from p. 205.) Hydropsyche partita, n. sp. (Figs. 58-59.) Black; head and thorax with gravish white hair; palpi nearly black; antennae yellow, with spiral black line; abdomen black above, pale beneath; legs pale yellow, anterior femora rather dark- er. Wings brown, denseiy irrorate with whitish, nearly ail over, the apical part very plainly so, a longer pale mark an hind margin before arculus: hind wings gray, darker on costal tip. Fork 1 longer than pedicel, fork 2 extends a littie way on discal celi, fork 3 with short pedicel, median cross-vein its length out on median ccli; in hind wing fork 1 is very short, fork 2 a long distance on discal celi; maie with eyes wide apart, flot enlarged. Expanse 23 mm. From Switzer's Camp, San Gabriel Mts., june, Mt. Wilson, 10 Aug., and Pasadena, May, ail California (Grineli); Pecos, New- Mexico, July, Aug., and Vineyard, Utah, july (Spaiding). Hy'dropsyche venularîs, n. sp. (Fig. 62.) Black; head and thorax with whitish hair; palpi very dark; antennoe yellow, annulate with brown; legs pale yellow. Wirigs pale, the cubitus heavily bordered with dark brown or black, anal also bordered, a large, elongate streak near stigma, somnetimes broken by paie spots, a black spot at end of first apical vein, apical part of wing often infuscate, elsewhere dark spots, often along veins, and some patches of gray hair, ail marks tend to be longi- tudinal; hind wings gray, tip darker. Eyes of maie large, approxi- mate. Venation as in H. scalaris. Maie superior plate with minute emargination, the second part of lower appendage verv short and broad, with bifid tip. Expanse 22 mm. From Washington, D. C.; Great Falls, Va.; Dane Co., Wisc. St. Louis, Mo., June to Sept. 1 had thought this.might be IL reciproca (indecisa), but that species is near H. scalaris. july, 1914 _ Mi",
         "TISE CANADIAN ENTOMOILO(IST 253 Ilydropsyche sIossonoe, var. recurvata, I. vaîr. (Fig. 73). Very siiîilar to siossonS iu appearaîîce ,tii\u003c structure, t he genitalia Of mnaIe on saine plant, the peniS haviiig practically t he saine structure, luit the superior plate has only vers' short pro- Cesses, instead of the long nes of truc slossonSo. From Go Homc Bav, Georgian Bay, Ont. (Wtlker). Diplectrona californica, ii. sp. (Fig. 6:3). Head black, with some yellowislî hair; palpi brown; antenii, hrown, annulate with pale, strongly crenate beneath; legs pale v'ellowish. Wings brown; quite hroad; stigmal area swollcn below in both wings, fork 1 but little longer than pedicel, fork 3 longer thit pedicel, fork 4 reaching far l)ack, before thyridial cross-vein; in hind wings fork 1 almost reaches t\u003cî the discal cell, fork 3 iiardly longer titan 1, iii botit wiiîgs discal cell is ov er titrüe tiînes as long as lroa\u003cl. Expanse 10 min. From (Clareîiiont, Calif. (Baker). Psychomyla diversa, n. sp. (Fig. 64). Black; palpi brownî antentie dark, faintly annulate witlî pale. black hair on face, lîrown on warts anid soine yellowish oit front of %ertex, thorax witlî black haiç; wings black, cspecially dark along the costa; no marks, sonte yellowish luair scattercd througlî the black; femora pale yellowish, in the nmale, tibia and tarsi dark or îîearly bîlack, iii the fenîale, pale, and in tîte femnale tîte wiîîgs are getterally less dark titan in the maie; male genitalia pale, the Lîpper lateraI pieces arc longer anid itot as broati as it P. canadensis; in fore wiîîgs the tip of the discal celi is oblique and( the fork 2 reaciiîs ole.half way back oii the cell, fork 3 begins beyondî fork 4. Expanse 10 itîni. From Black Mt., north fork of the Swanîiao- River, N. Catr., May. Phîlopotamus. Fork 1 very short; hind tibi.e flot more hairy titan rest -f legs; tip of female abdomen rloes flot forni a long ovipositor. 'llie genitalia of otîr two species (dislinrius and aflîericapnus) aire figred.",
         "Il M 254 Till CAN.XIAN ENTOMOLOGIST Dolophîlus. Fork 1 reoClieS to (fiscal ccli; hind tibl)e Of Maie very hairy: iii fcmoale thc ti1î Of abdomen forms a long ovipositor; in ur species the discal celi is flot angulate above. 1 ha~ve two species Of this genus as defincd ahove; the charac- tcrs used to distinguisli the Europcan spccies froim Philopotarnuis (Io flot apply to our formns. Dolophîlus major, n. sp. (Fig. 66). B3lack, wsitlh black and goldcn-yellow hair; goîlen hair on front of vertex and[ ba.se of thorax; palpi brown, anteonne dark, amnu- late with black, coxa oald fernora rather dark, rest of legs paler; abdomen black; wings black; fore wing beautifolly spotcd with golden hair, spots rallier smnall, and inostly subequal in size an(l sittrate in the cells, ecai al ccli with four to ten of theim, ail ov'er wings; hind w4ings llaC7kjsh. Wings long, fork 1 rcaches Io the discal celi, fork 2 is ils widtlr on (fiscal cell, fork 4 a little bc- forc fork 3, bJ\u003cth long, discal celi nearly three timies as long as l(r((a(; hind wings wsith forks 1 a(1( 2 very narrow, as long as in the fore wings. Expanse 22 111m. From Black Mt., nortlh fork of the Swannanoa Riv'er, N. Caor., May. 1 have no\u003e fernale, and its large size seenis ont of p\u003elace ii ibis genus, lbut the genitalia and long fork 1 wilI not fit in 1\u003e/z o polap mur. Dolophîlus breviatus, nl. sp). (Fig. (i1). Face dark; antemnnie brown, annulate with yellowishi; palpi ltrown; gray hair between antennaw, and on v'ertex and thorax, a tUft o\u003ef black hair near each eye; abdoinen brownish; legs yellowisli, brownjsh on tarsi; hind tibLze with much long pale hair. Wing-, dlrk, densely irrorate with golden, a large golden spot before and mie lîeyond stignia, costal area inter rupted once witlî golden; thu golden on wing is so (dense a reticulat ion that the dark appears to be broken into mnany littie rectangles; hind wings gray, hlackish i tifp. Fork 1 reaches to dfiscal cell in hoth wings, in fore wing, forks :3 and 4 subequal, in hind wing fork 3 is inuch longer theil îwdicel; the third joint of inxillary palpi much longer thon fourth: in femiale there is a long yellowish ovipositor. 1.",
         "CAN ENT VOL. XLVI. NEW AMERICAN TRICHOPTERA. Pl-AILXX. yi",
         "256 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST. l.xpanse 12 11111. 1-romn Coy f len, t haca, N. Y., J o y, and Bilack M t., north fork Swannanoa River, N. (Car., May. Plectrocnemla canadensls Bks. (Fig. 37), My POlycent ropus canadensis rnust le refcrred to Plectrocnemia, unless a new genus is Illati for theSe smnall forms. The female has the zni( legs with dilated tibia and tarsi, but fork 1 is prescrnt iîî hoth wings, and discal ccll elosed in hoth wings. In fore wings. fork 1 is as long as its pedicel, fork: 2 hack to discal celi, fork 3 with short pe(licel, fork 4 back as far as fork 2. In hind wings fork 1 is about as long as pedicel, fork 2 reaches to cell. The maie gcnitali,î are figurcd. It occurs in many places in Easternî States. Plectrocnemla cinereus Hagen. (Figs. 25, 20). This is a larger species than P. canadensis, but the malt genitalia, which are figmîred, are similar. Plectrocnemla adîronica n. sp. (Fig. 60). Palpi hrownish; ittËelfle pale, broadly annîtlate with brow~n: vertex with gray liair in mniddle, black hair o11 suies; whîtish hair on thorax; abdomen black abîîvc, yellowish bcncath, legs pale *yellowish. Wings gray, with blackish marks along costa andi *cubitus; blackish spots at end of veins, yellowish between theni, rest of wing with pale l)rown areas, mostly with yellowish liair; hind wings pale, darkcr at tip. In fore wings no fork 1, fork 2 reaches a little way on discal; fork 3 with short pedicel, fork 4 hardlv longer, îlot as far lîack as fork 2, fork 5 lîroad near base, iii hînd wings fork 1 is nearlv as long as its pedicel, fork 2 liack oni cell, fork 5 very I rnaîl; the' maie gen italiafhave a rat her long meil ventral plate. Expanse 20 main. From Axton,Adirondaek Mts., N Y., 12-22 Jine(MacCillivra%,) The absence of fork 1 in the fore wings makes its generic positioîn rather doubtful; if the loss is accidentaI, it is a Plcctrocnem la. Phylocentropus vestitus Hagen. (Fig. 35). 1 cannt sce any difference in the maIe genitalia bctwcen tii large sprnng spxeilîens anîl thle srnail au tuiin specinlens, hoth i i SMi",
         "THEF CANANfAN ENTOMOLOGIST 257 which OCCUr here. 1 have one s[)CCillen il] WhiCh fork 2 is stalked in ail four wings, al very lunusUal variation, ,Is fork 2 is normaîl y the most constant of ail the forks. 1 figure the Maie genitalia. Neureclipsis signatus Banks. (Fig. 72). My Pal vcentropus signalus bclongs to this genus, 1 figure the maie genitalia. Hlolocentropus interruptUS n. SP. (Fig. 71). Brown, wjth white and gray hair; paipi paie yeiiowisb; face w~ith dark brown bair, white hair on vertex and thorax; antennSe veilowish, annulate with brown; legs paie yeilow. Wings brownish, with many spots and dots of whitjsh hair, the costal area is inter- rapted three times with white, a white mark over stigma, beyond are white spots between ends of veins, larger spots on basai middle region, elsewhere mostly small, but ofteo connected, fringe bilack al ends of tl1e veins, hyaline marks flot noticeabie. Fork 1 is shorter than pedicci, sometimes oniy one-haif as long, fork 3 is twice as long as its pedicel. Lower appendage of maie is broader at baefa nH lavus. A siender appendage on each side of ls(xlv like Diplectrona. Expanse 17 mm. From Hampton, N.H., June (Shaw); l)ane Co., Wisc., juiy (Vorhies); and Squam Lake, N.H., julv (Allen). Ilocentropus offtus n. s,). (Fig. 69). Palpi hrown; antennie yeilowish; face biackish, vertex with w hite liair in middle, black on sies, thorax white haireci; abdiomen I)rown, yeiiowush beneath; legs yeliowish, tarsi darker. Wings Ibri)wn, with sonle white spots, three in the costal area (one each side of stigma), around the tip are white spots hctween veins, and il few in middle of wing, but flot as numerous as in IL interruptus; hiaci wiogs gray, with blackish fringe. Fore wings with discal ceii about equal to the pedicel, fork 1 very short, fork 3 as long as pe\u003cljcei. fork 1 reaches oniy a littie before fork 3. Genitalia siiiiilar to Il. interru plus, but the iower appendages are flot as Ibroad, and their upper tips are produccl inward so that they touch t ýIh other.",
         "258 THE CANADIAN ENTOMOLOGIST Expanse 16 mmi. F rom Clear Creck and Chimney Gulch, Golden, Colo. (Oslar) ilolocentropus longUS n. sp. (Figs. 65, 68). Palpi pale, dark on Iast joint; face clark, with black bristles above; vertex black with white hair; antcnnze i'ellowish, annulatý with brown; thorax with white hair; legs yellowish; wings brown, irregularlv spottcd with white, four white marks on costal arc. before ý-tigma, spots between veins on niargin, and m îny elsewheru, * cten connecte(]; hvalinc marks îlot distinct. The fore wings aru longer than usual, fork .5 with sides parallel fur most of its lengil, iii type fork 1 is a Inere rudiment at margin, but iii another speci. men ( 9 ) it is longer than pc\u003cIicel, in this feniale there is a short fork 1 in one hind wing. Expanse 20 mm. * IFroni Fraxninghain, Mass., Jone (Frost), andl ligby, Noi Scotia (Russell), June. *Polycentropus centrais n. sp. (Fig. 67). Palpi y'ellowish; antenn.e pale, annulate withi dark; face browîj, vertex with yellow hair in middle, black b\u003e' eyes, thorax 'siti golden hair, abdomen brown ahove, yellowish below; legs yelloi. Wings dark brown, rather denselv spotted with patelies of '.ellowN hair; anal and cubital veins more heavil\u003e' black than others: lîî,s wings gray', blackish at tips; fork 1 about as long as pedicui, venation othcrwise likc P. confausé. Size, rather smnaller th.i, P. confusus, and lom er maie appendages of different shape. From St. Louis, Mo., Jonc. Polycentropus confusus Hagen. (Fig. 70). This is commun in Northern States; the maie genitalia .tit figured. (Tu bec ontinliel.) BOOK REVIEWS. AT XI'ExmooeMEoICALE NTOMOI.OGY. By Walter Scott Patton, M.B. (Edin.), I.M.S. and FrancisWilliam Cragg, M.D. (Edin.) I.M.S., London, Madras and Calcutta, 1913. The science of medical entomology, althoughi of very reccui origin, bas developed so rapidl\u003e' within the past decade and tic M.",
         "TIIL CANAIN ENTOINIL(ST 259 litcrature is scattered tlurough su mnl;ly periodicals tîjat il bas~ become a difficuit Illatter, even for the specialistý to k(. 1) in tuolu With ail that is bcing writtcnl on the subject. ' A comprchcensi.c textbuuk of miedicai eittoloiogy li.i there- fore beca urgcntIy nccdcd and the appcarditcc of tie mîonumncîtal work by Captains Patton anti Cragg wiii bc wclcamcîld flot oniy lic cntonnoiogists but aiso by mledirai practitionr, iii tropical Jllis and iîy students of protuzooiagy, witiî which subjet nicdical ento-i m010gY is s0 closeiy associatcd. Tis voluminous work extenîls ov'cr 764 pages ami inciludes no icss thaît 89 full-pageilsrtîî i t' bulk, lîuacî'cr, isnu the rcsuit of diffuscness, for the diction is clear and concise, buit of the vast quantity of information it cotams. Considering the widc field it cavcrs it is flot to\u003c, large for at uîsefîl work of rcfcrence. Pcrhaps the inast striking fcature of the book is the large annouint of original flatter baUt in the îext and t ilustrat ionls, which arc uniformiy excelent. Much space is dcevoted ta the .inatony anti pliysiology of iilot-sutk-ing iînsccts ~.part icu iarly t o lie structure and nicchanisni of the rnîîLthîIîarts, uud to thet de- scription of methods of brceding and lai)iJ.tiiry techînique. The gencral features oif inscct anatomny ad physioiîîgy are iliustrated by reference ta the I)iptcra, particul.îriy the various blootl-sucking types, a nuier tof wiîich are tlescribecî iii consider- able detail, but flanc of the orîlers that coîttain species oif interest from the rncdicai staîtdpoiîtt arc neglect*î, cari order fiîrmîiîg the Suiiject tif a chapter of its uwn, except tie l\u003eipîcra, whici inclutie I wo chapters, iii adldition to te oi nc iii wlich te aria t uîy aiid plîysioiogy arc treatc\u003cI. In each chapter the subjcct is discusscd front cvcry staifltpoiîit, the anatony, taxonomy, relation to discasc anti bionnics, ail re- cciving adequate attentira. Valuaiîic information is also givcn oii îîcthods of caiiccting, dissectiîîg anti prcscrviuîg anti ecd chialter concludes with a careful bibiiographly. 'l'le analyticai kcys ta the genera ad specis have been takcî fruîn tlîc bcst sourcs availalit\u003e The iast two chapters deai rspcctivcly with iaiioratîîry tecl - nîique and a gencral discussion of thli relat ion o\u003cf Artiriipaîis tri thîcir parasites. Altogethcr the authors arc ta lic congratulated on the splendid \"t",
         "*260 THE CANADI.AN 1,ENTOMOLO1ý(,IST fruit tif tîtuir lilttr,, fuor illu %vîrk N%)(1tt ii have eit at trii Ii ami cîttîn try, andj is dihrefître bhe moî re rUiljrkalel foi-ha lîiiig tui w rittuî uiîtiruly iii uinia. ELUiTIL\u003eN 01.' THiE C(1.1 US I'AT TEItN i NTiti M t\u003cRtiE PIDlOPTEiti t t' ( ~~ENU us LTHOC tLTi, By Aitt t lranceus Brauin. Joui rit, Auad. Nat. Sci., PltiIa. (2), XVI, p.10 68 itb 26 le\\l figutres anti] pls. 111 anti IV Wi tIi 99 colon red figu rus. Ili ibis wttrk Miss Braun, whi s weII knciwit inie ars of tIti Canaîlian En tornîtlugist for lier wutrk titihe Tinî'idl,', bas flii(l t careul stidv oif the nmimerons speiuuis tif thu gciius Lithocolluîis, wiî b th buljct tif ilutcrnîiiiiing itbu prinmit ive ctfltu r patin 'coîtf tht getis aînd t he principlus inîvuilved iii ilts evtîltiît arnoîig thlu varins spcies. The work is itased tipoî a comnparativec sttirl ofi tIlie adu! is of 95 spucies as well as itlce luveloiijiînt ttf te tu p pt wings iii 1l representativu fomnis. U lic guticral ctoncuîsitons arrivuti ai arc as (tiilliiws 'Tli piiiii tive pattertn tif the foîre wing uonsists oif a series tif sevuil pale yelli transverse hands scparatcd lîy unpignîunîtld aruis, tlte arraîngementi tif tbc lanuls lîaviiîg tL dcliit relationi tii tlî course tif the hiiîgi- tuirial veins. 'lThsu pîrimiive liantits uonist itili thtei grîîuul tit oor oif Ille wings atnd tcnti to licctîîi I rtiailr dîtriiig bt oiitnt \"genc andi phlogenetiu dcveltîpnient, ini stîrne sîîuuics suffiîsing the cîîîfri wing. I)ark markings appear only at ihe liitaits lîctwucîi Iit grountl uoloi.r anti tlîe unpignîcntctl amics, bunt tlîcsc niarkiîîgs onîce firmly estalilisbcd iii tlîe spcius lîctîmu indepunulent tif extcensioni of tie grîtînt utîlour. i t is suggesîud t bai \"'te li nifin îî ellowisli grint ci lîtîtr wli cl suffuses thbc wing iii tic bigliur Lcîiiliiîtera-, lîcgiîiîing ail f uic t li ase antI spreatling disîtalwarîl, is tlîc otuîuonic tifa pbyltigcneli ually oldur type of marking, originally iauided, and later fuscd ttî i tiniforin colotir, atnd that the rnarkings arc a scotndl serjus super- împoscd ujion tbc first.\" Tbe ocuircnuce iii soutc tif thc bigîtur L.epitlojtcra of îlark biantds in pairs scunîs ti lic an itndicatiton tif their origin on ech sitc tif a primitive lbantd of tbe grouid colotir, ain Litocollctis. The work is illustratcd iîy many text-figurcs andI twi etîlourcîl pilates oi wbicb tbe figurus tif 92 specius arc grîtuput iii tlîe forni of î a phyliigenîc itruc. e. u.tu M i ii' u liii ih, Itii L"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "London [Ont. : The Society, 1914]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Bimonthly, 1991?-",
         "Index for v. 46 in v. 46, no. 12, CIHM no. 8_05087_551."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canadian entomologist"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_05087_546",
      "label" : "Vol. 46, no. 7 (July 1914)",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_05087",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_05087_546"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_05087_546/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06922_92/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06922_92",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06922",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "label" : "Vol. XIII. No. 12 (December, 1917.)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06922_92",
      "title" : [
         "Canadian Forestry Journal. : Vol. XIII. No. 12 (December, 1917.)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Woodstock, Ont. : Printed by the Rod and Gun Press, [1917]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly 1913-1920"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "dian d-1 XIII. DEEM ER 191 No . 12...",
         "*Foresters, Jten tion Have You Ever Seen a Robe Like This Before?, Note the Pure Wool Kersey Lining7-the Cambric- ParÏtto.nsX that contain the Eider- CýtRCP 11'S tlown Filling -and the VAEP-0 C Watepr6fed \"H igh u Count\" Shelter Tent Duck.- A great combinatîin-absolutely frost-proot--light .as a feather and Iasting almost until the end of t rnîe. You need one-you should have one. 'Send us your name for ftirther\"information. ~AT .., OTTA WA Smart- Wvoods Limltea W!NNIPEG THE UNIVERSITY (FTORONTO' UNIVERSITY COLLEGE WITH WHICH ARE JEDETUATED VICTORIA, TRINITY, ST IICHAEL'S 4 KNOX and WYCLIFFE FACULTIES 0F ARTS APPLIED SCIENCE MEDICINE EDUCATI0OT HOUSEHOLD SCIENCE FORESTRY For further information, apply to the, Rqiutrar of thie University, or to th Scretries of the respective Paculti.",
         "CIRCULATION, DECEMBER,9 6,500 CO PIES Cànadian Forestry Journal1 vol. XIII.' WOODSTOCK, ONT., DECEMBER, 1917 No. 12 CONTENTS FOR DECEMBER Guarding ntrosNorth Land.._ .... ... 1425 In the Forests of Siberia..,,..ý 1... 428 Forest âStrength and Fighting Strength.................1431 Digging the Grave of Ptoae1432, Studying Forestry ini the Forest. ...... 1434 Should Forest Taxes be Levied on Yield................ 1436 Pulp Wood Lands Reforest Slwy1437 Fast-growing White Spruce in Qee.............1439 Turning Timber Orders towards Canada....... .....ý.ý....... 1440 The Ghost of the Tr.e Verse. 1441 Coupling Science to Timber Crops ....1443 Logging Debris. ...An Imperative Problem. ... ... 1445 The Dawn of Science in Lmeig1446 How fast does a Forest Rebuild Itself?............. 1447 The Canadian Forestry journal will be sent to any address for one dollar a year, subscription including ail other publications of the Cana- dian Forestry Association. Addreu all Communications Io THE CANADIAN FORESTRY JOURNAL. 119 BOOTH BUILDING, OTTAWA Printed by the Rod and Gun Press. Woodatock. Ont. Entered at the Pos t Office at Woodatock, Ont., as econd..clas matter.",
         "1424 Canadian Foreslry Journal, December, 1917 __________________~~~4~ ~ Q O O O c (':2 O o Q I O O O O O 1~ O O O (5 u O'",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 Guarding Ontario's Northland BY E. J. ZAVITz, PROVINCIAL FORESTER OF ONTARIO. Thirty-Five Districts Created, 85 Towers Erected, Over 1000 Rangers Employed. The Forest Fires Prevention Act passed by the Legislative Assembly of the Province of Ontario in 1917 places the administration of forest fire protection under the Forestry Branch of the Department of Lands, Forests and Mines. Without going into the details of this new Act it is of interest to point out the new features which are added to Ontario Forest protection. Con- trol of the setting out of fire within forest regions is given through Regula- tions passed by Order-in-Council. It is necessary between the 15th of April and the 30th of September to obtain a written permit in order to set out fire for the disposal of slash or other debris. This written permit is issued by the fire ranger or other duly authorized official and contains certain restraining conditions. The ranger is given special instructions in reference to the conditions under which the Permit is issued. For example, the ranger may find it advisable to name the exact hour at which burning shall start or that some special protection be provided while burning is being done. The issuance of the permit reqùires the personal inspection of the ranger. Another feature of the new Act is the provision for the disposal of fire hazards. * Wherever conditions exist which are a menace to life or property the Act provides for definite action by which such danger may be re- moved. Field Organization The forest region of Ontario, sub- ject to the Forest Fire Act, is divided into 35 Districts, each of which is in charge of a Chief Fire Ranger. Dur- ing the past season we have had 34 Deputy Chiefs assisting the Chief Fire Rangers where areas were large or difficult of access. The maximum number of rangers for any one period of the past season was 1039. In addition to the above organiza- tion we have had 12 Railway In- spectors, whose duties were to carry out the provisions of Order 107 of the Board of Railway Commissioners for Canada. For inspection purposes the forest region was divided into three In- spectoral divisions with a Superin- tendent in charge of each division. To sum up, during the past season the entire force required in the field, for the carrying on of this work, was 1123 men. You will readily under- stand that with a territory so large it will require time and experience to work out the most satisfactory field organization. 85 Towers Erected Forest fire protection cannot rely alone on the ranger or patrol system. The 1000 men in the field as rangers are helpless if not backed up by moder detection methods. During the past season the look- out tower on high points has been introduced into nearly all of the dis- tricts. The Nepigon Reserve had previously adopted this method and found it a great assistance in. the detection of fire. During the past season 85 towers have been built at a cost of over $10,000.00. These towers are permanent structures located so that communication may be had by telephone with outside assistance. In addition to the permanent tower, rangers are instructed to clean out trails to high vantage points. These observation points frequently com- mand the view over vast areas and are of great assistance in locating fire. 1425",
         "126Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 One of the most difficuit problems in connection with fire detection is to keep up lines of communication. The look-out tower withlout com- munication by wire is of small value. The look-out towers in Nepigon Reserve are Lied up to 130 miles of telephone uine. We have at present about 200 miles of telephone line available in Forest Reserves. Throughout most of the settlements in the Clay BeIt where towers have been built local telephone lînes are available. Along some of the rail- ways it will be possible to tie up with the local stations. This whole question of communi- cation will require special attention. We have not rushed into the con- struction of telephone fines on a large scale, feeling that more study should be given the problem. Reaching and FightingF Fire Locating, forest fires is a -comn- ,paratively simple matter. Reaching them in tîme to take effective meas- ures is the serious problem. In many of our districts the only way of reaching interior fires is by long canoe routes and trails. However, in such districts fire hazards are usually small owing to the inaccessibility of the territory. Where roads, navigable water or railways make rapid transportation possible there are varîous methods to be employed which help in solving the problem. During the past season we have employed three small power boats along the shores of Georgian Bay. We have larger power boats on Lake of the Woods, Winnipeg River, Lake Nepi gon and Lake Temagami. 'In addition to the above seven power boats we have several outboard motors which are primarily intended to assist Chiefs in covering territory where previously they had long canoe routes on the larger waters. Using a Fire Boat The most efficient arrangement to be made with a power boat is such -as we have on Lake Nepigon. The boat remaîns the major portion of the time at a definite headquarters which can be reached by telephone fromn the outlying stations and look-outs. This boat is equipped with fire pump and 1000 feet of 1i 9 inch hose, also other fire fighting equipment and can pro- ceed to a fire with the least possible delay. At present we have three pwrboats equipped in this manner. Onwrailway lines we have five power miotors used for inspection and carry- ing fire flghting equipment. In pat- rolling some 80 velocipedes are being used and such mechanical attach- ments as the Smith motor which are being tested. Last Spring five-motor-trucks were purchased and these are giving good results in the districts where roads are passable. 185 Canoes' in Service This organization carnîes about $100,000. worth of equipment. In addition to, blankets, canvas buckets and minor equipment, it was neces- sary to purchase this season 185 canoes at a cost of $ 10,000.00; 200 tents at a cost of $3,000.00; 28 new velocipedes at a cost of $ 1500.00. One of the problems connected with this work is the overhauling and re- pairing of equipment. and its proper storage. This has required the build- ing of central stoÉehouses. Five storehouses have been buîlt and several others leased temporarily. Record-of a Busy Season Improvement work such as con- struction of trails, etc., can only be carried out efficiently after the field organization has been perfected. Our orglanization being less than a year old bas much to learn but the follow- ing. are some of the more important improvements carried out Ibis past Summer. New fine rangers cabins built .._44 New docks or boat landings ..18 Acres of fine hazard bunned _3356 Mil1es of old trails and caiioe routes cleaned out 1... ... .._031 Miles of new trails opened 51 Fine signs posted ...........65000 In this connection 1 will refer to the Permit System. Owing to a very wet season in the Temiskaming country this system was nol given a sevene 1426",
         "Çanadian Forestrg Jot trial., Our rangers issued 3886 Per- mits and no serious opposition was encountered. Fire Statistics for 1917. 1. Number of Fires:- M ay- ... .._ _..... 441 June .. ........ 317 .........l..... 152 Aug ..... _ ..._ -115 Sept... .... ................. ....... _66 Total ..... 1,09 56.1 per cent. did flot exceed 5 acres. 2. Causes of Fires- Campties............ ...... ...... _98 Railways..... ... 541 Lightning .... .... 28 Indians ....... ...........54 Logging-Operations. ..45 Miscellaneous ......... . 40 Unlçnown- ... ... 194 Total........... ......1,091 A reas Burned 3. Timberland, mainly conifer- ous, ...... 7 1,910 Ti'mberand, mainly hard- 10 Cutover, some coniferous timber left«.... ................... 148,368 mnal, December, 1917 1427 Cutover, some hardwood timber left .............................._ . 2,160 Young growth, mainly coni- ferous.................. .... 6 ,2 Young growth, mainly.hard- Wood ...... _ ..... ............ 13,202 Barren ......... ....... 82,922 Grassland ...... .._ ... ..2,332 Total... .. ......._ _381,629 4. Ft. B. M.. .....__15,278,000 Cords ....\u003e.. ..... .. 90,446 Tics ..............781,685 Posts........ .......... 150 P oTes ......... ......125 ,5. Private property.....$2727.00 The forest region of Ontario over which our organization lias jurisdic- tion covers an area of over 100,000,000 acres. The greater part of thîs region is covered with coniferous growth. Large areas have been cut over leav- ing inflammable slash. Three trans- continental railways pass through this territory over one thQusand miles in length opening.it to prospector, tîmber cruiser and scattered settie- ment bringing in their wake pro- blems of fire protection. Over 4,000 miles of railways cut through this forest region. Wilson Avenue, St Thoma-Seo Note, Page 1458.",
         "1428 Canadian Forestry Journal, Decem ber, 1917 ln The Forests of Siberia By L. 0. WILGRESS CANADIAN TRADE COMMISSIONER, OOMSK,. SIBERIA Vast Areas Awaiting Foreign Capit'al and 'Enter- prise-Governrnent Adheres to Scientific Forestry The forest wealth of Siberia is a reserve upon whic-h foreign mnarkets will tndcubtedly commence to draw in increasingdiquantities in order to replace the dirinishing supplies of timber frcm other sources. Measures are now being consideTed whereby the forest resources of this region may be utilized to greater advantage, parti- cularly as regards the developinent of an export trade abroad in Siberian forest products. The timber' trade is regarded as one of the readiest means available for paying off the interest on the -public debt of the country and readjusting the balance of trade. This question is of great interest to, Canadians, not only in so far 'as Siberian timber is likely to compete on the United Kingdôm and other markets with the products of Canadian industry, but also by reason of the opportunity which wilI be Y rsented to Canadian manufacturers orr' the supply of machinery of various kinds. Much of Siberia Unknown The forest area of Asiatic Russia bas been roughly estimated at 853,000,000 acres. The St ate owns the bulk of the forests of ihis reion, the area amounting to 642,000,000 acres, of which 39 per cent is clasËed as rich forest lands. In addition the forest possessions of the Imperial Cabinet have coinprised an area of 54,000,000 acres, chiefly in the Altai district. These forest lands will now probably be converted int national property, and more attention de- voted to the exploitation of their tinber wealth. Large tracts of forest land also belong to the Cossacks, prticularly along the Amur river in Eastern Siberia. The largest forest areas of Asiatic Russia are in the western and eastern regions of Siberia. It is estimated that in that part of Siberia which lies west of lake Baikal there are 465,000,- 000 acres of virgin 'torest, and Eastern Siberia, while nof so richly endowed, lias' sullicient timber to supply the requirements of foreign markets for many years to corne. A large part of the forest area' of Siberia is sîîll unexplored, the resources -in number of trees, species and value being un- known. Thus it is estimated that only about a quarter of the whole area had been either wholly or par- tially învestigated by the year 1915. The investigations which hae been made, however, have unquestionably established the great value and wealth of these forests, whule as regards theé exploitation of their timber resources, onl a fringe has yet been touched. Future Prospects The measures are now .being con- sid 'ered whereby the forest resources of Siberia may be exploited to better advantage. For this purpose con- ferences -have been held between those interested in the timber trade and the Stateý depariments, concerned. Il lias been realized that in order bo increase the timber outputs, a correct systein of management of the forests is necessary, together wibh the organi- zation of the sale of timber. A re- liable investigator lias stated that with proper exploitation the timber wealth of Ibis region shôuld suiffice for the requirernents ,of Western Europe for many generations to corne. In order to make possible, however, the shipinents abroad of Siberian foresb products,, a proper organization is required, backed by suificlent capital 10 enable the adoption of up- to-date extraction methods. An en- 1428",
         "Tii.e foreman of thua jephalting Job 'thought thls waa the. correct mthod of surroundlng a tree. largement of thle existing mills and the creation of new saw-mills xviii aiso be necessary, as well as the establishhIent Of Other industrial concernis using Wood as raw materiai. Closeiy related to the question of the organization of the sale of timber is the crcation of railm'ays and waterways cornnecting Siberja with the markets of Western mille by rafts or are on barges. The scar- IIýY Canadian P-- T- our uw, Duecember, 1917i 1429 In a few weeks thi ell tree Commences to lift the pavement. A costly mistake whlch could easi1y have been guarded aganet. Photos taken on Wî1ton Crescent, Ottawas city and higli cost of labour at the' present time is directing the attention of timber producers to the question of introdticing Iabour-saving appliances. Inquiries are being made for portable hoisting cranes, while it is probable -that a demnand co uld also be created for, other logging appliances in use on the American Continent sucli as cableways, stationary engines, trac- tors, locomotfres, etc. State Control Extended A plan was adopted before the war for the cutting of timber from the State forests on a large scale. The management of the forest lands be- longing to the Government in Siberia lias been. largely in the hands of the Colonization Department of the Min- istry of Agriculture. This department operates several saw-mills and sup-",
         "1430 Canadian Forestry Journal, Deceinber, 1917 Whirling through the paper supplY Of the London Pafly Mail. one of the bit mnachinesAlt the Anglo Newfoundlafld Developmnent CompanY- Logging by cable in Est Africa. Through tht. territury the. Britishi have gradually driven the. G.rman force. until the enortnous territory lu now officially 4dcared frtee of the. enerny.'",
         "Con adian Forestry Journal, Decemlier, 1917 13 plies.the peasants and newly arrived immigrants withý building materials and other wood products which they require. Although the future position is uncertain, it is probable that the Colonization Department wýill take over the forest lands which hitherto have been under the control of the Im- p.erial Cabinet. Little has been done up to the present for the exploitation of the timber wealth of these lands. F ore-st Strengthi and Fighting Strength By DR. J. W. ToumIRY, DEAN 0F YALE FOREST SCHOOL The strength of Germany in the present war has to a large measure been due to hier vast reserves of for- est capital. If France had not had a forest capital adequate to supply the numerous needs of hier vast arm- ies, the powers of central Europe would be in Paris to-day. Forests For Defence The world has discovered in this war that forests are necessary for national defence as well as necessary for industrial development and pro- gress. , No country in its progress from barharism and primitiveý needs to culture and industrial development, bas'been able to maintain its forests in a productive condition without organized effort and the execution of extensive plans for reforestation. Time To Begin Is Now Althou gh the immediate future supply of wood in this country is secure without giving special atten- tion tLo reforestation, it is inevitable that it will be deficient both in quality and amount, if we do not, as a nation and as individuals, give more atten- tion now to reforestation and im- provement of second growth. One hence. We need not if we begin now to work for the orderly develop- ment of the second growth, if we have foresight and sense enough 110W to plan for the kinds and anlounts of timber that we are to cut fifty, seven- ty-five and a hu nd red years from 110W. Must Plan Long in Adoance The protection and development of the'second growth ought to be a prominent question in national, state, and communal councils to-day, while. we have abundance of wood. A crop that requires from seventy-filve to a\" hundred and .twenty-five years to reach economic maturity,ý must be planned for long in advance. MAHOGANY CANQES FOR CANADIAN CAMPAIGNERSI Major John S. Leitch, one of the fire rangers of the Dominion Forestry Braneh in Manitoba, who has been overseas from the beginning of the war with the Royal Fusiliers in British East Africa, writes as follows- \"Out in the tropics the major- ity of rivers can be crossed by a standing jump as'it were. Rivers such as Canada has are a great surprise to the tropical man. What canoes are -here are dug- outs made by natives out of solid mahogany or teak trees. They take months to make and are very heavy. 1 have yet- tc see the first Africa1 making a p ortage with his canoe on his back. Some, of these canoes are big enough to take 60 men or 3 ons of stores.\" 1431",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 Digging The Grave of \"Patronage\" The avalanche of newspaper con- demnation of the patronage system and approval of the Union Govern- ment's assurances of its elimination continues in all parts of Canada. Again and again influential dailies and weeklies declare that the inter- ference of the politicians with such technical branches as the Dominion forest service can not again be toler- ated. A few excerpts are herewith added to the group published in the November \"Journal.\" Abolish It \"Abolition of patronage,\" asserts the Vancouver \"World,\" is heartily welcomed in the technical services of the Federal Government departments. One such service is the Dominion Forestry Branch, which undertakes the protection from fire of enormous areas of forest in the Prairie Prov- inces and in British Columbia. Since the formation of the For- estry Branch, the greatest handicap on its usefulness has been political interference with appointments to the field services, these services including not only fire ranging and inspection, but the important work designed to supply western farmers. with shade trees and shelter belts. \"Astronomers and Rangers\" \"Very few peuple in the Dominion would probably be greatly distressed to learn that the royal astronomer knew nothing about astronomy, be- cause it would not affect them a particle, and they regard the whole astronomical department as more or less of a fad,\" remarks the Toronto \"World.\" \"Unfortunately too many people take somewhat the sane view of the important forestry work of the Dominion Government. They see no particular harm in any young fellow who wants a vacation being appointed a fire ranger, and some of them probably regard forest pro- tection along the eastern slopes of the Rocky Mountains as more or less unimportant. The fact is, however, that the for- estry service not only guards against fire, but engages in the important tree nursery work designéd to pro- vide shade trees for the vast stretches of treeless prairie farms between the Red River and the Rockies. The work done by the men in this depart- ment is often. technical\\ and always important. The general public will back up the demand of the Canadian For- estry Association that the civil ser- vants employed in the forestry branch be among the first to be brought under the civil service commission, so that appointments to and promotions in that branch may hereafter be made upon merit, free from political inter- ference. \"Cut it Out\" Under the above headîng the Hali- fax Chronicle says in part: \"The Canadian Forestry Associa- tion comes forward promptly with the suggestion that a start be made by the abolition of patronage in thew matter of appointments in the Out- side Service of the Dominion For- estry Branch. . . . It is to be hoped the Government will lose no time in putting its declared policy into operation.' 1432",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal,ý December, 1917 1433 Shlpbuildlng in B~ritish Colunba.-».eck vlOw of a wooden schooner during construction. Courtesy \"Canada Lumberman\"» through the. skeleton of one of Canada'\u0026 new !rs on the Pacific Coast.",
         "1434 Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 Studying Forestry* in the Forest How The Forestry Students of New Bruns- wick Train Un de r Woods' 'Conditions. One of the interesting forestry enterprises in Eastern Canada is the field work of the- Forestry Depart- ment of the University of New Bruns- wick, u nder Prof. R. B. Miller. This department was inaugurated in 1908 and has enjoyed a steady develop- ment witli a promise of greater growth in the near future- due mainly to the expansion of forestry activities on Crown Lands by the Provincial Government. Belonging to the University is a tract of about six square miles of timber land. Within the past six years, the value of this tract fromn two standpoints lias begun to be realized-(1) For the production of wood and timber, and (2) as a train- ingrounid for forestry students. -It shouid al so, as time goes on, possess considerable value, as a place for experiment and as a demonstration forest. With these ideas in mind, a beginning at least lias been made by the University authorities to pro- tect it from fire and trespass and to so, handle it that its value will be en- han.ced by wise use and judicious cutting. acsil It is very acsileto market, has two good sized brooks; not drivable, however, *and is'penetrated in ail directions with woods, roads' and trails. According to an estimate made in the spring of 1914 by for- estry students the land lias an acreage in its various classes as follows: Acres 1. Old clearings andl cuttings. - .218 2. Barrens and swamps. .... .... _316 3. Old, farms ..... _.490 4. Growing timber. 261«-..6... Total ....... ..... . 3640 Helping The Woods Spirit When it was first proposed to build a camp the University Senate con- sidered it a doubtful experiment be- cause'no camp three miles from town could long survive. HoWever, it stili. stands and lias done more to stimu- late tlie true woods spirit tlian any WOOD CU'ITING ON COLLEGE L 1434",
         "Canadian Fores!ry Journal, December, 1917 FELLING TREES FOR STEM ANALYSis other part of the çquÎDpment. It has taken forestry out 'of the laboratory and the lecture room and established it where it belongs-in the woods. The building--is 16 x 20 fee$, inside, of peeled spruce and fir logs, chinked with moss. -The tar-paper roof has been recently shingled because woods- men tell us that a camp enters into. senile decay at the top and Dlot through the rotting of its timbers. The total cost of the camp, including hardware and floor, was flot over $25.0O, the work being done entirely by the students. So far it has neyer housed students for a week or two, but its chief use has been as head- qUarters for work carried on on Sat- lirdays, being within easy walking distance of the University. IJQw The Camp is Used The work of the faîl terni of last Year may give some idea of the use- fulness of the camp as a center of Dperations. Juniors were assigned certain 25 acre lots to cruise and make ý silvieulural report upon, turning I' a topographie and type map of these lots plotted to a scale of five chains to the inch. They had asso- ciated with'them the lower classmen, five or more men in a party, the Junior directing the work and looking after -instruments, etc. Later on in the faîl, felling operations started and they were assigned to work in stemn analysis of spruce and fir and' volume table work on paper birch, following the choppers. Ifthere were not enough trees down, some wentý to felling and sawing them up into log lengths, others disposing of the brush and slash, unt Il each tree was properly finished. The next Sat- urday, perhaps, yarding started and some were put to scaling logs as they were piled. Whien snow comes they assist in the preparation of the haul- ing roads and by Christmas have had a chance to learn a variety of things about mensuration and logging. Boys from the city are less expert with the axe and saw and are given special opportunity to learn practical things. They are not kept at one ýkind of work too long,, but long enough to learn how it is done. Tree Studies In the spring, after the snow had 1435",
         "136Canadian'Forest.-y'Journal, December, 1917 acquired a crust,.work was resumed in estimfating plots by the sample, tree methodls, determiming gr.owth per cent. offelled trees and. sainple plots, the data secured being worked up at the office periods. Following out this systeni of, co-ordinating field and office work, most of the subj ects in Forest Mensuration could be covered in-a year, omitting 'some of 'the more' complex to corne later unider.manage- ment., 1At flrst the camp is a noveltyý and a chance for a day's outing, but it later becomes more or less of a field laboratoryv, depending upon the dis- position and seriousness of the stu- dent. Here students and teaclier can meet on a common level and seek from the woocls an answer to woods questions. .Outside of the mere in- formation imparted, tliere is the hieh- er and more 1asting value of learning to feel at home in the woods and the securing~ of a proper attitude toward tlie profession and the ideals for which it stands. The department bas lost lieavily tbrougli enlistmnent,« about thirty be- ing overseas or in training on this side, so that the loyalty of our for- esters cannot be questioned. WHAT. N-EXT?-A \"PAPERLESS DAY\"ý? NO -PAPER'TO-IDAY? Is that Whatthey say? No check, drafts nor'nots- No bis, blanks nor votes. No letters from folks! No need- for 'dicta tion1- No bond ini the-nation.' No paer Containers, No lgal Retainers, No paper men fawn, No waste baskets yawn! \" No parcels w\\rapped Up, No \"scraps\" for the pup! No blotters to flout, No dolls to clip out, No crisp breakfast flakes, No Parchment w rapped steaks! No wrappers for Bread, No books for the Head. No files to searcli through, Why, there's nothing to dol Paper is vitally essential to the moral, mental and physical well-being of any but aboriginal people. And who wants to lie an ab-o-rig-i- nee?-From the Parcliment Prattier of the Kalamazoo Vegetable Parch-, ment Company. Should Fores t Taxes 1Be Levîed on Dealing with the problem of forest taxation, whicli is fast coming to tlie fore in -Canada, Profesýsor Ralph S. Hlosmer, head of tlie Forestry de- partment at Corneil University, sug- gests as a remedy \"that a tax b e laid on tlie yield, once for ail, when Jli stand is flnally liarvested. During its period of growth tlie forest pays no tax under this plIan but when it comes to bce eut, t he owner pays to tlie state a f air percentage on the yield-5, 10, or 15 per cent. as-tlie case ia y be. But lie knows before hand what to expect and further- mlore that lie wiIl be subjected to the tax Qflly once, and tliat at the time-when lie received his return on~ the investment. In addition to this tax collected when the tumber is eut, this plan includes also a nominal yearly tax on the ]and itself.\" Says Prof essor Fairchild of Yale University: \"The tax on yield lias many) decided advantages. It avoids the evils of the general property tax. It is equitable and certain. ht is in liarmony with the peculiarities of the business of forestry and will be a distinct encouragement to the prac- tice of forestry. Its adoption by the states wQuld rem~ove one obstacle to tlie perpétuation of the nation's forest resources.\" Yield? 1436",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 13 Pulpwood Lands Reforest SIowly Optimistic Attitude of Lumbermen and Pulp Limit Holders 18 Not Justified. During thepast summer, Dr. C. D. Howe, has been engaged, for the Commission of Conservation, upoil an investigation of the reproduction and growth of the pulpwood species, after ,logging, in the St. Maurice valley, Quebec. This study was initiated as part of a broad investigation to determine what technical measures are neces- sary to ensure the perpetuation of tht vast pulpwood forests of eastern Canada. This project will necessarily. require a number of years for com- pletion, since it will be necessary to place parties in the field in other portions of Quebec as well as in typîcal districts of Ontario. Possibly similar work may later prove feasible in New Brunswick, although the investigations under way in con- nection with the present forest survey- in that province wi Il furnish at least. a very considerable portion of the basic information necessary. Hardwoods Dominant Dr. Howe's investigation shows that, while the conif trous species comprise about two-thirds of the forest numerically, in the section of the St. Maurice valley investigated, the proportion is practically, reversed when we consider the relative space occupied in the crown cover by the conifers and hardwoods. That is, the hardwoods monopolize the light to the extent of about two-thirds while the softwoods fill but one-third Of the crown cover. Thus, the liard- This region was first lumbered lightly for white pine squared timber between 50 and 60 years ago; then more 'closely for white pine and spruce sawlogs about 30 years ago. Since then, practically tht whole area has been cut twice and some of it thret .times for sawlogs or puipwood or both.' Tht obj ect of the investigation was to determine the condition of thest cut-over lands with respect to tht regeneration'and rate o f growth of tht present pulpwood - producing species, namely spruce and balsam, with a view to estimating tht future crop. A Comment on Culting Tht resuits of the investiga- tion show* that the optimiîstic attitude of lumbermen and limit holders in regard to the repro- ducing power of this type of forest is not Justified. Tht good yields of pulpwood material at the end of each of the several cuttings in the past 30 years do flot represent the amount of growth accrued during the inter- vals between cutting periods, but are obtained by cutting suc- cessively smaller trees, and in general lower grade material, and also by includlng a larger proportion of balsam in each cut. For example, the spruce stunips were measured and classified ac- cording to the age of tht cuttlng on sample plIots, totalling 50 acres, and the resuits are here stated : Slumps Grow Smaller *In cuttings from 15 to 20 years old the average diamneter of tht stumps was 15 inches; èuttings 10 Lo 15 years old, 12 inches; while in cuttings Iess than 10 years old, the average dia- meter was il inches. This shows a reduction of 4 inches in tht average 1437",
         "1438 Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 diameter of the trees taken witliin the past 15 to 20 years. The actual reduction, however, is doubtless greater, since the measurements re- cord the present diameters, of the stumps without makig allowance for reduction in size by decay in the past two-or three decades. The tallying of the stumips on the sample plots showed the followîng increase in the proportion of balsam, cut for pulpwood. On areas lumbered earlier than -15 years ago no balsam was cut. In cuttings from 10» to 15, years old, 65 \u003eper cent. and 35 per cent. respec- tively were spruce and balsam.\" In cuttinigs five to 10 years old 45 per cent. of the stumps were spruce and 55 per cent. balsam, while in cuttings less' than five years old the proportion is 22 per cent. spruce to 78 per cent. balsamn. Young Trees Present So far as numbers are concerned, this culled-over forest is well supplied wîth young growth of potential pulp- wood material. The condition of the average acre is represented in the columns below. SPRUCE Seedlings, trees up to l in. diameter, 635 Saplings, 1 in.-4 in. diameter._99 Poles 4 n.-8 in. diameter.. ........._30 Trees over 8 in. diameter ...__6 BALSAM Seedlings, trees Uip to 1 in. diaineter ................ -... -........ ...... -.3,972 Sapliftgs 1 in.-4 in. diamter ...... 161 Poles 4 in.-8 in. diameter ....-........59 Trees over 8 in. diameter ...... ...._.6 The casual observer is in daneer ot being misled if he bases his prediction of an abundant future crop of pulp- wood upon the number of young spruce and balsam trees beneath the forest. The anlount of future pulp- wood material and the lime of harvesting the crop, depend as well upon the rate of growth exhibited by the young trees now present. T ese statements refer to thetlime required, under the given conditions, to inake a merchantable forest from the seedling stage onward. It will be seen from the foregoing table that there are 30 spruce and 59 balsam trees froma 4 inches to 8 inches in dîimter already present on the average acre. ,They will furnish another crop of pulpwood material in time, but here again the time is long. The growth tables show that it will require about 70 years for the 4-inch trees and about 50 years for the 8-inch trees to reach the 12-inch diameter limit. The larger balsam. however, will be merchantable in 10 years or less. (From report of Comm ittee orÏ Forests, Commission of Conservation.) CANADIAN. AIRPLANE OUTPUT' The factories operated in' Eastern Canada by the Imperial Munitions, Board for the m\u0026nufacture of air-- planes now has a monthly output of well over a hundred machines, ac- cording to word recently received here. The sprluce used in making the airplanes is c ut in British Co- lumbia, and a market tor'a consider- able quantity of-B3ritish Coîhumbia Coast spruce, which otherwise'might not be used for commnercial 'pur- poses, has Dow been found. THE FORESTRYPROFESSION Says \"American» Forestry\" con- cerning \"Forestry as a Profession\": \"In Germiany a forester cares for about 10,000 acres of forest and usually has two to four assistants. On this scale we would need a body of 50,000 foresters and about 200,000 assistants, besides a large body of specially trained labor, to care for our woods as they should he cared for. To-day not the hundredth part of this number of available men exists in our country. The American way is not to run after the salesman-the inan who has his labor or his goods to off er must hustle and prove his worth. It is a safe estimate that 10,000 good, capable, honest and industrious men can find employment in the for- est work just as f ast as they really hustle and prove that they are worth having. And 5,000 more of stronger men can force their way into the for- est business and acquire forest prop- erty and be their own foresters.\" 1438",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 '3 Fast-Growing White Spruce, in -Quebec Demonstrating the Possibilily of Producing Pulpwood ini 30 Years. (,a) Ordinary Growth. (b) Fast Growth' A piece of ordinary growth white spruce showing almost fourteen annual rings, compared with a -plece the samne size of rapid growth white spruce from Quebec. showing a littie more than two annua rigs Bath pieces are magnifled two diameters. A sample of wood recently sub- i tted to the Forest Products Labora- tories, Montreal, shows what may be expected of white spruce when it is growing in a favorable position. The free fromn which the sarnple was taken uwas 29 gears old and was 12 i nches in diameter at 18 inches fromn the ground, which means thal Lhe tree averaged to add almost seven- sixtecnths of an inch to its diameter every year of its life. lIt is interest- ing to know the effect of such rapid growth on the properties of the wood and the following gives the results of certain determinations together withi comparisons with wood cf a' more usual, slower growth. The âbsolutelv dry sDecific zravitv based on determinations of niany samples, the average weight per cubie foot of white spruce, absolutely dry, is about 27 pounids. It appears, therefore, that this rapitlly grown specimen is about 20 per cent. Iess in weight per cubie foot than the aver- age white spru ce. Since spruce is the most valuable wood in Canada for suiphite pulp an examination of the Iength of fibre was made. This showed that in the last year of growth, iLe., 29 years from the pith, the fibre averages 3.45 millimeters in length, and at 19 years from the pith it averages 2.72 milli- meters in lenigth. It ma), here be stated that the fibre ordinarily is longer in each successive year's growth until about 50 annual rings have been formed. Furthermore, at any given number of years from the 1439",
         "140Canadian Forcstry Journal, Dece.mber, 1917 pith the fibre is longest at from. 10 toý 30 feet f rom the ground and decreases gradually either higher up or lower down. Now for comparison we have figures'fromi ordinary growth, white spruce as f ollows,-in onie tree at 3 feet fromi the ground and 30 years from' pith, average length of fibre 2.2-5 millimeters; in a second tree at 8 feet from the grouind. and 20 year .s from the pith 3.01 millimeters, and at 30 years from the pith 3.65 milli- meters. Keeping in mind the f act that the fibre in the, rapidly growni specimen was taken at only 18 inches f rom the ground it appears safe, by comparison with the other figures quoted, to state that the fibre in this particular tree averages at least 10 per cent. longer than in the ordinary white spruce. One may conclude from. the re- suits stated above that white'spruce, plantedin favorable ground and' pro- tected from suppression by crowding, will yield trees of good size for pulp- wood within 30 years, and although the wood wilbe slightly lighter than that of slower grown trees, the fibre will be of good length. H. N..ý LEE. Wood Technologist, Forest Products Laboratories of .Canada, Montreal. Turnîng Timber Orders Towards Canada One of the most interesting ques- tions aw,,,aiting the close of the war is Canada's future# share in the timber market of the British Empire. AI- ready a readjustment is in process whereby it is hoped a larger part of the enormous volume of timber orders given to Russia (60 per cent.. of the total requirements) will be turned towards Canada. Readers of the Forestry Journal will be glad to know that the Executive Counicil of the Imperial Institute in London has constituted an Advisory Committee for Canada. This committee con- sists of Sir George Per]ley K C M G. High Commissioner for aànada.,chair- man; Sir Robert Kindersley, K B.E, governor Hudson's Bay Company; J. G. Colmer, C.M.G., former sec- retary, High Commissioner's office in London; J. H. Plummer, Dominion Steel Corporation, and Sir Keith Price, of t he Ministry of Munitions. One of the most important matters on which action is being taken by .the committee is that of the more extensive utilization of Canadilan tim~- bers in the United Kingdom. The Imperial Institute Advisory Com- mittee on Timbers has been taking of practical trials of selected British Columbia timbers to be carried out by H.M. Office of Works, with a view to the inclusion of these tim- bers in officiai specifications. «SUPPRESS THE PATRONAGE EVIL\" Says Industrial Canada, organ of the Canadian Manrufacturers' Asso- ciation, Toronto: \"That live organization, the Can- adian Forestry Association is awake to every opportunity to promote its propaganda, the safeguarding of Can- ada's forest wealth. Industrial Can- ada is quite willing to second its plea for more careful and impartial selection of the men on whose effi- ciency so much depends in the way of conserving our great forest re- sources.\" A CORRECTION In the November issue of the Jour- nal an article on the 1917 forest fire k sses on the territory of the St. -Mau rice Forest Protertive Associa- tion contained the statement that 1440",
         "Canadian Forestry ,Journal, December, .1917 14 j ::The Ghost of the Tree : BY HOLMAN F. DAY, IN -KIN o' K'TAADN\" \"I have heard some of y0u. woodsmen talk about the ha'nts and the swogans and the with.erlicks and the side-hili loungers-says The Stranger. I know these are jokes, my friends, but do you know when I arn up here amorxg these trees that are doomed in these days to the grinders of the great paper milis, I feel a queer obsession. I feel that -each tree has a sort of soul,-a spirit in it, and one potent both for tremendous good and tremendous evi.l. Strong as the weight of the avalanche, Then they heard the pulsing chopping Yet weak as brook-breathed vapor, as the axes chocked and chccked, I mnust obey--but then I sway-- And they feit the forest's tremor as Behold me-I arn paper. the toppling giants rocked. Then as back and ever backward I \"arn ha'nt of the heart of the Tree, were the elves constrained to, fiee, the ghost of the hemlock and spruce, On the bark they knocked and whis- Phantom of fibre and wraith of the pered: \"Wake, O Genii, of the wood b y the axe of the chopper Tree\" turned loose. Cased in the coffining bark long was I arn Paper, I arn Paper. Have yo'u I hidden and furled, praises or abuse But now by the manual magic of men For the message I arn bearing? Look I carry the news of the world. to them, who set me loose; Look to them who sent me whirling I arn free-free-free- through the boiling slui1ces' jaws, 1, the soul of the Tree, And to them who held the tree trunks Joy and sorrow and terror or smiles- to the yelling teeth of saws. seek for them ail through me. Yes, to them who tossed the gobbets Fame and name and shame, of the sodden, dripping wood To me they are ail the saine, To the slavering, -grating, grinder, I carry them ail to the ends of the grunting neath its iron hood. earth, adFor they free frorn solid fibre might Horror adpleasure and rnourning and spirit of the tree and mirth, That In race o'er whirrrng stearn- And to me neither credit nor blame. drums textuire book and forrn in Me. I arn Paper, I arn Paper, pallid spirit If I wrench your soul with anguish of ihe spruce, by the message that I bear, Summoned far frorn soughing forests, Look to them who duil my whiteness patient servant fôr your use. -those who spread the poison there. Tliey were sent who stormed the mountains on- which, silent and I arn Paper, I arn Paper, standing serene, masdready for your c ail, Crowding masdthe ranks of wood- White and silent and unspotted; I arn land, mighty Army of the Green. serf and slave to ail. First the woodelves saw with terror Hlave you thought or inspiration? flash and flicker of the axe, Have you word to send or sav And they watched the steady heaving I arn waiting, calrn and patient, st of the broad, red-shirted bacKs; your servant and your slave. 1441",
         "1442 Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 Couirtesy l'Canada Lumbermian.\" Shipbuilding lni British Columia.P1acing the frames. Nearby are the keel blocks ready for another ahlp. Write! What is it, threat or secret, bargain, pledge, or sale, or boast? Sign! Ah, mortal, I have bound you! .ýMark you well the forest's ghost! lere 1 stand and. threat and mock y ou, shade of promise, debt, or fraud, Work and pay or pray for mercyl You are servant, I arn Lord., I am~ ha'nt of the heart of the Tree, the ghcst of the hemlock and spruce, Phantom of fibre and wraith of the wood by the axe of the chopper set loose. Bearing the news of the world, or message of cheer or of hop e. Binding to bondage of dent or of shame, or dragging a neck to the rope; 1, the soul of the Tree, Hover fi-om sea to sea- Theirs the fault or theirs the praise who have helped to set me free. Fame and namne and shame; ,To me they are ail the saine; They who have dragged me out of the wood, B3e I for evil, be 1 for good,- To them be the credît or blame. Grim. as the weight of the avalanche, Yet weak as hrook-breathed vapor, 1 I must obey-but then I sway: Behold me-I arn Paper. MUNITIONS BOARD OPENS CAMPS E. L Kinman, acting for the Im- perial Munitions Board, has pur- chased a holding of the Merri1l-Ring Logging Company at Jackson Bay, B..The Board had found great difficulty in securing suitable tiniber sticks for its shipbuilding programme. The lot purchased carrnes perhaps thie most available stand of exceptionally large fin in British Columbýa. It will be logged in full length, the location and ground conditions readily per- mitting this. To get the contents in board feet of a sixteen foot log, measure the top diameter inside the bank in inches, subtnact four, squiare the remainder and add twenty per cent. for the final resuit. 1442",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 14 Couling Science to TLimber Crops By ýG. C. PicHE CIIEF FORESTER 0F QUEBEC AT INAUGuRAL LUNCH- EON 0F THE WOODLANDS SECTION 0F CANADIAN PULP AND PAPER ASSOCIATION, MONTREAL...... Value of Limits Is Not in Area But In Ability to Produce Permanently. 1 have always wondered why such a clasà of men were flot taking more care of their forests, why shouid they bend their efforts only in one direction. It is very sensible to. improve your \u003efabrication, but why s.hould'you leave your forests, your source of raw materiai in a bad state; why flot appiy *the same methods of scientific man- agement that you empioy successfuiiy in your miii for the production of *your timber supply; why leave your forest operations in the hands of your choppers, of your jobbers who have only a precarious interest, instead of employing teehnical mnenasy oud in your milis. Is this not aiackof foresight, and-if you would be sin- cere-have not some of you fou nd that the savings made in your miii by your improved methods have been more than wiped out by the increased cost of your wood? Why should the cost of your wood always be on the in- creasing scale whereas you have succeeded in halting your cost price in your miii, to an aimost fixed basis, and then when the cost of labor and supplies follow the same trend on both cases? 1 know some will object that ou~ are obiiged to go further for your .ogs, that driving is becqming more and more expensive, bu t why did you not forsee this? It is becoming a necessity, an im- perious want that the paper men will devote some of their energy-_to the care and handling of their wood- lands. It is obvious that a well de- fined program should be foilowed and the work must be systematized if resuits are desired. A Permanent Forest The pull) and paper industry, being estabiished for a long time cari afford to manage its forests on a premanent basis, better than any other class of lumberman. Therefore there should not be any' hesitation in considering the question from a broad point of view; and though the expenses may seemi high in rnany cases they wili often be an addition to the capital of the company just as when you replace a type of screening machine by a, more efficient one. The question of depreciation of timber limits -is ano- ther subject 'that should be con- sidered, broadly-and I am giad to note that at the last enquir., £hrected by Mr. Pringle thîs was agitaied with good and'telling effect for many who îgnored it before. The Value of For 'esters I suppose that you expect me to draft a sort of a program. I feel the necessity of. one, and however im- p erfect it may be, it wiil pave the wav for discussion, for suggestions, and something may come out of it. Naturally the first effort to be made is to secure the proper man to put in charge of your timber lands; wîthout any question this man should be a forester, a man with teclincai train- ing, and I hope that my friends of the technical section wiii not dispute me in this matter. You do not go to any plain man for your chemical work, but employ a chemist; for your engineer- ing work you empioy a real engineer; why flot employ a good forester for your forest work? Some will object. that a practical man is needed. This question of practice has aiways been brought forth by the men who wanted to save their jobs when a better mani appeared on the stage. A forester needs practice as much as the chemilst, as the engineer, but lie does flot re- 1443",
         "1444 Canadian 'Forestry Journal, Decem ber, 1917 quire to have grey hairs, hie will flot be apy good then. lie wiil be afraid of going into the woods, his rheuma- tism will prevent him from plodding ail over the works. A forester if given a chance, if employed for the work for which lie lias trained himself will certainly do good. Irwentoring Timnber The next move is to make an in- ventory of your timberlands.. Ho* can you work without this data' ? You keep a strict account of your stocks o f suiphur, of coal, of china dlay, of colors; why should you flot do the sanie with your forest? The operations to be conducted in an efficient manner must be directed by the head office according to a wo rk- ing plan and flot be carried in a hap- hazard way as done now. The tim- ber should lie eut not only on one river, with the chances of j amming, but on different streams and on sev- eral grounds so as to equalize the cost price, instead of ailowîng it to jump aevery ,year. The improve- ments to be made in the way of port- age roads, of depots, of river dlean- ing, of dams, should lie known in advance and a fixed budget prepared every year for the carrying of this class of work. Growth Studies Studies should be made of the rate of growth of the 'vari ous species found on your timlierlands; so as to know how they should be eut. Investiga- tions of the oid lumliered tracts should also lie conducted so as to find what have been the resuits of the lumbering as it was done then. A good de ai coulcl be learned this way which would help greatly for drafting plans of Iumbermng on similar areas. We have begun this work in a few locali- ties, but the province is too large and the interested should have the sanie studies made for their own benefit. Are Our Mills 'Limit Poor'? Reforestation is another subjeet that will require to be looked ter. With the Increasing cost of lalior and supplies, it will become more and. more neeessary to have a larger yieid of raw material per unit of surface, instead of culling on an average 2,000 feet per acre; it will le far more economiÎcal to eut in 30-40 years from now 5,000 to 10,000 feet per acre. I dlaim that most of the paper men are limit poor, as a mili pro- ducîng 100 tons per day would only require a forest area of 200,000 acres, of 500 square miles, if same was man- aged to produce wood properly. What an enormous capital is'carried use- lessiy by the companies on /account of the fact that their holdings are too pori tiniber.. I calculate that by adding $10 ore to the cost price of your wood you could reforest, enough Içind each year to insure you a permanent suppiy for the future.- Naturally the question of tîme will have to lie considered here, but in your plan you can take care of this matter. How To Use Flardwoods The utifization of the hardwoods is another subject that should be taken into consideration. It may lie neces- sary to modify the present methods of lumbering in order to assure a more complete utilization of ail the trees now found on the timber limits but this prolilemn requires an 'im- mediate study, and we should ail unite to find the solution. BURNING WEEDS BY QIL SPRAY To eliminate growing vegetatLion from the tracks of the Spokane, Port- land, and Seattle Raiiwý,ay during the past summer, an old oil-burnîng loco- motive ,vas equipped with an in- cinerator and dispatched over the line. The apparatus was designed by the mechanical department of the road and performed efficiently whien placed in operation. Fuel oul and steani to atomize it is carried through pipes to a series of six burners mount- ed a few inches above the rails and just ahead of the ieading pony truck. They are arranged in a sheet-Iron box that is filled with crushed firebrick and are similar to large blowtorches. To deflect the heat against the road- lied, a large shîeid, supplied with a 1444",
         "Canadiin, Forestry Journal, December, 1917 14 of the pony trucks there is a sprinkler density of the vegetation. that is used as a protection for theA ties. The engine carnies a supply of Asomewhat similar contrivance. fuel oîl and can cover from 15 to 20) has been in use on the Canadian miles a day depending o n t h e Northern western lines. Logging Debri-4n Imperatice Problem BYELLWOOD WILSON FoRESTER 0F THE LAURENTIDE COMPANY, GRAND MERE, P. Q. .The next'step in forestry progress in Canada will probably be toward the betten disposai of logging debris. 'With the advent of co-operative fine protective associations and the con- sequent great improvement -in the forest fire situation and the greater knowledge of the causes of tires and the_ means for their prevention, it is being realized that. could we econ- omically and practically do away with the siash from iogging opera- tions, one of the most serious of the; remaining causes of forest fines would be eliminated. A fire once started in a logging slash is practically im- possible to extinguish until it reaches an unlogged section or some other bannier. The uncut forest, except in exceptionally dry seasons, does not \u003c,.t(-h fire readilv and the fire, if dis- of snow on'the ground, and is very easy in soft wood operations. For two winters, the Forestry. Depart- ment of the Laurentide Company has been cutting hardwood- and ail of the debris hias been burnt without diffi- culty. The dlaim that the additional cost is too great might possibly be true if only one operator burnt his brush, but if such disposai w-ere made compulsory by law, ail operators w,,ould be on the samie footing, and it would be no hardship. A Mi'sleading Idea The claim that has often been made that it is cheaper to spend more for fire protection, instead of burming hrush, is plausible but fallacious. Even by putting on many more rangers, it is very diff jouit to keep fires out of slash, and once started, the remaining timber is almost cer- tain to be ruined before the fine is Y ut out. Our dependence for the utune is entirely on the uncut fores i and the cut-over areas, on which trees below a certain diameter limit and the young growth are left and these must be thonoughly protected. The whole subjeot is being carefully studied and as f ast as the owners of timben lands can be brought to see the necessity of absolute fire pro- tection some practicable law will be formulated. The first Pennsylvanian to really appreciale the vaiue of fcrests was William Penn himself. In 1681 hie provided that for every five acres cleaned in Pennsylvania, one acre should be left in woods. 1445",
         "1446 Cnadian Forestry journal, Deceinber, 1917 77ie Dawvn of Science in Lumbering By HUGO WINENWERDER DEAN 0F COLLEGE 0F FoREsTRY, UNIVERSIT3t 0F WASHINGTON Logging and lumbering is flot the gamne il used to be. We stili cail it a game, but if it is it looks a good deal like a hand in poker when the jackpot holds ail your resources and the dealer hands you nothing hetter than a pair of deuces. Lt was no0 trick to, make money ini the lumber business 20 years ago, but during the la5I 10 years ît took a. genlus., Loggîng cha nces are every~ year becoming more and more difficuit, more effi- cient, Ihougli aI the same time more complex. machinery is necessary, so that logging is becoming a highly specialized and technical engineerng prohlem; mean and discouraging labor problems, that can no longer be soved through the labor agency, but re- quire a thorough knowledge of econ- omics and humait nature and the patience of a divinity for a solution, are constantly bobbing up; more efficient methods in manuf aclu ring have become a necessity; transporta- tion problems are now almost con- stanlly in need of attention; and the marketing problem which didn'l exist at ail 10 years ago, has, in ils war with the substitules, become one of the most important in the industry. These are only a few of the moreim portant general roblems in the ever- growing load \u0026¶e industry has to carry on ils shoulders. There is a limit 10 human capacily, and if these p roblems are ever b hbe solved il will have to be done by experts, who have the technical foundation and the lime to work them ouI thoroughly. The Forest School Can Ifelp You know as well as 1 do thal in looking afler the daily routine of your business, both you and your present administrative organization of managers, superinlendents and foremen don't have the lime 10 make extended studies on the problems ltat are in need of investigation, and thal -il would be done better and much more thoroughly if you had some one with the proper Ilechnical, training who, working under your- ,general supervision, could give ail, or'nearly, ail, of bis lime 10 Ibis work. Every other really big industry îs doing il. You've gol to come toil., Your industry is shouling fromf the housetops riglil now for just Ihat kind of thing. Why not xm'ake a starl immediately? You know that y ou have a hundred and one prob-' lems thal you would like 10 work (,ut, any or ail of which may mean grealer eff.iciency resulling in smaller oper- ating cosîs. T'eclinical Questions That you wiII look td the forest schools 10 supply you with men of suifficient technical training s0 that you can gradually work thein intoý positions where they will be a hel» in the solution of these problems is evident froni the demands thal have been made on the technical schools of other industries and are now beîng made on the forest schools by the lumber industry. Our worIk as an. information bureau concerning tech- nical questionts that arise in the in- dustry has been growing tremendous- ly, and il is a barometer that shows your lechnical difficulties. One )f the most expensive woods used in .America is boxwood. It seils. f-)r about $1,500 per thousand board leet. News has reached Ottawa that the. son of Mr. E. W. Beeke Lt, .Crown. Timber Agent at New Westminster, B.C. bas been killed ini action. 1446",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 14 How Fast Does a Forest RebuildlItself ? The rate of growth of trees in the forest is usually exaggerated greatly. Dr. C. D. Howe, who during the p ast summer made a study of the reproduction andý* growth of t he pulpwood species after 1ogng, in the St. Maurice Valley, Quebec, on behaif of the Commission of Conservation, produced the following conclusions: Over 2,000 trees were analyzed to determine their rate of growth in diameter, height and volume., While the resuits of this study have not yet been tabulated, they have gone far enough to justifNy,4 the statement that within the forest type under consideration, it takes about 40 years for the littie spruce trees to acquire a diameter of one inch; 100 years to make a six-inch tree, and 150 years to reach thç minimum diameter limit of 12 inches established by the cutting regulations in Quebec, for white and black spruce.. Balsam grows somewhat-faster. A one-inch tree is made in about 16 years, and it takes in the neighborihood of 70 years to reach the Quebec diameter limit of seven inches ai two feet from the ground. 1447",
         "148Canadian Forestry Journal,, December, 1917 -Twen t--Iwo -Times as Ma-ch B. C. Timber .Ll urned as lias Been Put to Use An astounding proof of heavy for- est fire losses in the Province of Brit- ish'Columbia is made public by the Commission of Conservation which lias been conducting an investigation of the forest resources of the province during the past four years. This investigation has 'shown that, on 95,000 square miles-nine tiies ~ize of Belgiumn-the timber has tiselessly destroyed by fire,,most- ly many years ago. The amount of timber so des- troyed is estimated to be 'flot Iess than 650,000,000,000 feet, or about twenty-two times as much as the total that bas ever been cut by the lumbermen in that province. Put- ting the loss in another way, this timber is equivalent to almost twice the amount of saw, timber now standing in the province, and to, nearly as much saw timber as is now standing in the f orests of ail Canada. Much of the area burned over contains young forest growth, which, if protected from further destruction, wilI, in time, furnish the basis for enormous industrial develolpment on our Pacific Coast. If we assume that the 97,000 square miles of cut-over and humn- ed-over lands should be made to gioduce an average of oinly 100 board feet per acre per annum, the total ln\u003ccrement would amount to 6,200,000,000 feet per year, or about five limes the present annual cut. That this estimate is by no means beyond the bounds of rea- son' 'Is shown by measurements of growth wlîich have actually been made. The Government and private oper- ators of British Columbia have real- ized fully the gravity of past losses by forest fires, aithougi ýprobably few were prepared to admit that the si1tua- Lion was as grave as the conclusi ons of the Commissicn of Conservation actually show. Happily the pro- vindi'al forest service is making sure that the annual losses are kept as close to a minimum as the present staff and expendit tires allow. This year, for example, the total losses to merchantable timber from forest fires was estimated at $ 178,401, which is a vast decrease from some of the summers prior to five years ago. At the saine timne it must be borne in mmid that a good many of thîs year' s fires were on areas prevîously burned over and, therefore, the timber crop was flot there to te destroyed. ~The total-estimated stand ot tima- ber in British Columbia to-day- regardless of present commercial value -is placcd at approximately three hundred and fifty billion feet. The commercially valuable timber- ed area of about eleven million acres i5 estimated to hear a stand of two- 1448",
         "Canadi'anFore.stry Journal, December, 1917 14 A Prophecp on Forest Denudation The Journal reproduces the follow- ing letter from the Montreal \"Gaz- ette\" because its authorship *Com- mands attention. Mr. William Little of Westmount, P.Q. was te a great degree the founder of the Canadian Forestry Association and has upheld it.s work with splendid zeal, even 110W when the. weighKt of advancedý years miakes' itself felt. As a leading lum.- berman and the son of a lumberman, Mr. Little has evinced ýa foresight no0 less noteworthy than his public spirit. Many lumbermen to-day re- count Mr. Liltle's early prophecies of Canadian forest condiLions which, w*hile gloomy enough then, have since proved abundantly true.. To the Editor of the Montreal Ga- *zette: Sir,-If you will refer to the col- umils of the Gazette of a quarter of a century ago, vou ;will find therein editorials by the Gazette and letters of mine b-y the score, protesting against the sacrifice of Our tîiber resources in the most reckless manner by our government for the merest trille of their value, beseeching them to take stock of our white pine and spruce tîmber before it, was too late, only te be ridiculed as visionary alarm ists. The End cýf White Pine N1ýow, at last, when our stock of white pine timber is reduced teo the mere cullings discarded by previeus operations, while in most of our log booms are found about nine spruce logs to every one of pille, and but few of these are over ten inches at 41- - ncurp fincl that our sDruce bite, 01 ine on, that in- posed, ma- y years, as istern Can- that about is the stock we are now to depend on, nlot only for our home requirements, but to supply the Empire and her Àllies that have been robbed of their timber by the German armies that de- vastated everything wherever tra- versed by them. Sjruce Prices Jump This scarcity of spruce timber is 110W becoming evidént nlot only here, but in the New England States, as is shown in the markets of Boston and New York, where spruce timbers that were sold three years ago at from $18 to $20 per thousand feet, are now seUl- ing for $40 a thousand feet, board measure, and the smaller spruce tim- ber that was of hardly any value, a few years .ago, is 110W, on account of its great demand for pulp and paper making, considered of almost as much- value as common pîne, s0 that the Canadian pulp milis that sold their output of woodpulp at $16.50 per ton in 1914 are sellhng it now at $42 per ton. And the spruce wood itself that was sold, f.o.b., cars here only two years ago for from $5 to $6 per cord for unpealed pulpwood, has Iately been sold at $15 per cord, for rossed wood on the cars. And a press item states that the pulpwood timber is now get- ting so scarce in the Adirondack woods that the pulp inills at Water- town, N.Y. State, are paying from $18 to $21 per cord for ressed wood delivered to their, milis. Effecis of The War And a glance into the future would indicate that even these prices must be greatly increased when accounit is taken of the frightful devastation of timber that has already been made in the foresis of Europe, notably in Belgium, France, Poland, Eastern Russia, Western Prussia, Austria- H-ungary, Italy, Turkey, Greece, Ser- bia, Bulgaria,, Roumania and even in Great Britain and Ireland; and it is known that in ail these countries the stumpage value of spruce and fir tima- ber even years beïore the war far exceeded any price paid for like 1449",
         "150Canadian Forestry Journal, Decemnber, 1917 'stumpage in either the Ulnited States or Canada, in many instances fully ten times the axhount paid here. One cannot fail to realize that sach property must rapidly advance in value when hostilities cease, which cannot very long be- deferred. How Europe's Foresis Pay I have a descriptive illustration of a spruce forest in Saxony which shows that the smaller spruce trees there were vaiued at $15 per cord stumpage, in the woods for 'pulpwood, and the larger trees were valued at from $25 to $35 per thousand feet; board meas- uire, for lumber. And'an illustration of a forest or fir timber in the Vosges, France, planted 100 years ago, that was valued at $1,500ý an acre or fully $40 per thousand feet stumpage. And another spruce forest near Ober- indorf in the Black Forest, Germany, was valued at $2,500 per acre, which is equai to $50 per thousand feet for the wood crop alone. Such prices as these for similar tira- ber shouid admonish us against fool- ishiy sacrificing our spruce timberfor one-tenth of its stumpage value as We did our white pine, and as we are now doing with our spruce, or we W'i11 soon have oniy the stumps ieft, as is the case with our pine, ta remind us of our great imprudence. ,-WILLIAM LITILE November 3, 1917. Slash Dîspo8al Experiments in Canada SpecIic experiments in slash dis- p osai on the Western Forest Reserves h ave been so successful that the Dom- inion Forestry Branch has decided to continue this work and, by means of investigations on larger areas and areas of varied conditions in timber, soil1, etc., to develop a poiicy which will render Canadian forests as free from lire danger, due to the ieaving of siash, as European forests are gen- eraily considered to lie. The experiments were first con- ducted under the easiest conditions, namely, in jack-pine timber, on small tracts, in somewhat open and even- aged stands without heavý,y brush, and on sandy land where the tire could not run easily. The brush was piled while the operation went on and burned later. Spruce f2)rest was chosen for the next experiment, and «here also resuits were salisfac tory, even though the litter customary on the forest floor of sucli forests wouid seem to offer a dangerous possibulity for fire getting beyond contrni in the burning process. At the outset, cau- tion dictated that the piling of the brush bie done by the operators and the burningby the forest rangers. Subequntl, owever, both piling and burning were given inte the hands of the operators, and it was found that burning immediately after the trees had been cut gave the most satisfacti on and proved the saf est method. The cost of this siash disposai varied from 25 to 75 cents per thou- sand feet board measure, according to the efficiency of the operators afier some experience, their spirit of willing- ness or unwilhingness to adopt this new method appearing greatiy to influence. their efficiency; that is to say, the higher cost was maintained for work done by operators who contended that the experiment woild. flot work, while the iower cost was the resuit where workers started in with the idea that the work would lie done well and quickly. Not the least of the benefits der- ived. from these experiments is the admission by a mai ority of the opera- tors that this is the proper method of handling slash to insure protection against tire, some also adding that haviug the brush out of the way facilitates further operations to suh an extent that they regard the coat of its removal as nrftclticnliv ni] -- 1450",
         "1451 Canadian Forestry Journal, Dec ember, 1917 How Manp Logs are Lost bp Sinking? One of the penetrating questions asked of the paper manufacturers of Canada in the course of the Govern- ment \"probe\" into news print paper prices recently has had to do with the percentage of loss due te sinking of logs between the timber lirat and the boom. This loss, if determiîn- able, affects the costs of operations and must be included in any thor- ough-going compilation of produc- tion figures. An interesting reference occurs in the weIl-known text book, \"Logging\" by'Prof. Ralph B3ryant, of Yale For- est School, as follows: From 10 to 30 per cent. \"4A very appreciable loss in driving timber is due to sunken and stranded legs. The extent of this loss is de- pendent on the species driven and the character of the stream. \"Where timber is brouglit down rough streamsâ, over waterfalls, and past obstructions it is often badly battered and broken, and grave1 and sand become imnbedded ini a large per cent. of the legs. Occasionally- they accumul.ate iron and spikes, especially where iron do gs are used in rafting. Much of this foreign matter is not readlly detected, and milis suifer a monetary loss due to damaged saws, and time lest by the saw-mill crew. \"The actual loss, in log scale from ail causes on the Mississippi River drives averages about. 10 per cent.; on the Cumberland and Tennessee Riv- ers in Kentucky, 10 per cent.; in Montana, 10 per cent.; spruce, 5 to 10 per cent. and birch, 3 to 27 per cent. on short drives in the North- east; hardwoods in Pennsylvaflia, 25 to 40 per cent.; yellow pine, 20 to 33 per cent. The loss in the Lake States mnay be as high as 30 per cent. On short drives of conîferous timber the loss is small and may be from zero te 3 per cent. This loss is due largely to sunken and stranded logs and flot to the deterioraLiori 'of sapwood.\" Evidence In Le gai Suit In the case of James Ln Gates, Elliott C. Young, Lumber Inspeçtor of District No. 2, Wisconsin, tried in the courts of LaCrosse, Wisconsin, in 1901, an attempt was made by plaintiff to comfpel defendant to re- imburse hlm for difference in scale between the \"bank\", and the boom.- During the trial promilnent lumber- men from the B3lack River district testified that \"there might and would occur a difference between the woods and mouth scale of from 10 Lo 30 per cent. Winning the Children for Forest Conservation The seheme of travelling lecture sets, iised by the: Canadian Forestry Association for the carrying ou of its propaganda lu many parts of Canada has been developed this wiuter much beyond the proportions of last year. Three outfits are uow employed, moving from town te town, and briu'g- ing the gospel of fcrest conservation to thousands of aduits and eilidren who could net etherwise be reached without heavy expeuse aud an in- crease of staff. What the \"Outfits\" Are These outfits stipply from fifty to sixty lantern slides mostly colored, and a readable maniustript, bound- in cloth board covers. They are used chiefly by school boards and chtirches, most of which possess stere- op Licou equipment. A lecturer is csen from amoug the school beach- ers or local clergymen, whose duty it is v, read the iutroductory story and accompany eaeh lantern slide, as projecced upon the screen, with a paragraph of descriptive matter, all",
         "1452 Canadian Forestry Journal, DeceMber, 1917 of which is contained in the manu- script supplied free by the Forestry Association. 1 Booking the Lectures The method of booking these town- to-town lectures'imay' interest mem-, bers of the Association. An arrange- ment is first made with the Boards of Education in about twenty towns and cities to use one of the lecture sets. The outfits are so prepared as to carry themselves automaticaliv from place ta place. Each is packed in a stouit wooden case, in which tb 'e :ndividual slides rest in the centre of inch-thiek layers of soft feit making breakage almost impossible. In the inside top of the lid îs pasted a route list of the towns and the dates when each must receive the box. A packet of ready-addressed, gummed lai»els is also attached to the inside, of the cover. Each recipient is noti- lied by letter a few days before the bo.x is to reach him. He,,in turn, is relieved of any trouble in sending the outfit tothe next address for hie tears off one of the addressed labels, sticks it on the ou tside of the box and hands the latter to the express agent at the conclusion of the engagement in his community. Each recipfient pays the small expressage fee. Remnarkably good results have been secured from the circulation of these lectures. Going direct from town to, town, much vraluable t 'ime is saved and not a little ex pense: School principals and clergymen. and leaders of Boy Scouts have taken up the idea with enthusiasmi so that the demand at present is in advance of the three lecture sets. It will be seen readil1y that thou- sands of Canadians are being reached in this way, and have been given an introduction to the subject of forest conservation. The public illustrated lecture cannot be surpassed as a Imeans of implanting ideas and creat- ing a body of permpanent opinion. A. few examples of how the Canadian Forestry Association's travelling lecture sets are being used and enjoyed are given herewith:- At London, Ontario, the Board of Education used one )f the outfits as the basis of five evening meetings, held in the schools of the eity. The report of the Secretary-Treasurer speaks of the lively interest shown by the senior scholars and their parents and of the entertaining and instruIctive character of the lecture materiai. Five meetings in one city from one lecture outfit is indeed a full measure of co-operation. At Bathurst, New Brunswick, the local nloving picture theatre was used to assemble the students of the schools where a Canadian Forestry Association lecture was greatly enjoyed. At Chatham, N. B. another outfit was utilized before a làr£.e audience of children in the assembly hall of Aberdeen School and reports speak of the close attention o\u003ef ail preseiit. At Brantford, Ontario, Inspector Kilmer reports that \"the lecture and views were both very imuch enjoyed and appreciated by the students and good resuits will eilsue.\" It is estimated that with the three travelling lecture sets at work, the Forestry Association by this means alone is speaking to a minimum of 2000 to 2500 young people every eek. 1452",
         "1453 Canadian 'Forestry Journal;ý December, 1917 National Existence and Forest Maintenance-! By DR. BERNARD E. FERNOW \"When the questions of the extension of suffrage to women, of tariff, of taxation, of coinage and currency, which are ail merely in- cidents, will have sunk into the background, the question of theI economny of the resources which constitute and sustain the political, commercial, and social power of the nation-long neglected-will stili dlaima attention; for only those nations who develop their natural resources econonhically, and avoid the waste of that which they pro- duce, can~ maintain their power or even secure the continuance of their separate existence. A nation may cease to exist as well by the decay of its resÔurces as by the extinction of its patriotic spirit. Whil'e we are debating over the best miethods of dlsposing' of our wealth, we graduai1)' lose our very capital without even realizing thefa . Whether fertile lands are turned into deserts, forests into waste places, brooks into torrents, rivers ohanged from means of power and intercourse into meanS of destruction and desolation-these are questions which concern the material existence itself of society; and since such changes become often irreversible, the damage irremediable, and at the same time the extent of available resources becomes smaller in proportion to population, their consideration is linally much more important than those other questions of the day.\" 1 White Fine Immune inN B. was held CroNwn Land Deparment. The opin- FrederiC- ion expressed by those present vwas aI!f of the that no White Pine Blister Rust has ât Forest yet been discovered in New Bruns- Pr'-f. R. wick. Arrangements were made ol of For- whereby the Forest Service wlll do .-ç1.,n, i s\u003cottinLý this winter under the direc- In 'regard to the Spruce Btud Moth, Mr. Tothili states that as a resuit of his sttudies of representative areas for the past five years in New Bruns- wick, hie is'of the opinion that the present outbreak is now on the de- cline. The staff of the Forest Ser- vice will also collect data in this re- gard this winter.",
         "1454 Canadian Forestrg Journal, Decem ber, 1917 A -New Medium Between Foresters and Woods Managers Recenll at Montreal was-launched a \"woodlands Section\" of the Can- adian Pulp and Paper Association. As expressed in the by-laws the ob- jects shall be \"to stimulate interest in more economical and efficient methods of production and utilization of raw materials for pulp, paper and lumb-er industries; and'to provide means for the interchange of ideas amongst its members and to encour- age investigation of woodlands prob- lems.\" This hêralds a -movement having the highest import for the wood- using industries of Canada. For alto-' gether too long, the technical for- ester has been an appendage rather than an integral of Canada's lumber and paper making enterprises. In, almost every other department of a paper manufactory than the man- agement of the forests, the technical expert has been accepted as a basic necessity. Now arises a medium, identified with the business contrel of the industry, whereby the For- ester may at Iast be allowed to place his special knowledge at a company's disposai. This will be. achiéved very Guarding 21' Wherever modern fores t protection gets a working chance, it demon- strates its ability to save public and private timbër owners an enormous amount of money. The past season was a tricky fire year in the Pacifie Northwestern States, producing no fewer than 7,688 fires, of which 938 are given as 'bad' fires. On regular patrol on the 21,000,000 acres were 2,579 regular rangers and 12,000 extra men were called in to fight fire at various times. The total happily by the creation of a sort of common council table at which the problems of the woods departments, should corne nearer solution. As knowledge of actual woods conditions ceases to be'guess work and becomes 5cientiflcally-proved, those responsible for the aiffairs of great wood-using corporations are coming more and more to realize that-the forest management of the past crannot hold the log supply abreast of the mill's necessities, can- flot 'make good' the common boast that'the 'timber crops are repeating themselves every thirty or forty years. The more data produced on. a forest region, the clearer becomes the conclusion that Eastern Canada's forests are rapidly deteriorating. If this i1s permitted to continue, the saine deterioration 'will eventually sweep the miii investments to ruin. It is high time, therefore, that the science of woods management was given more scope in actual cutting and logging practice, not by brushing L re sent men and methods to one side btby giving effeet to the most rea- sonable and valuable elements of each. Million Acres expended for fire protection 825,000. On the lands of t ern Forestry and Conservat: ciation, 650 patrolmen exti ,2388 fires. The Ioss of tir very much under previou 7 years. One of the special causes o",
         "1455 Ganadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 CHEWING TOBACCO has thousands and -thousands of friends, who enjoy daily ié~ its rich and A\u0026 Iasting flavor Sold at 10c a PlUg",
         "16CInadian FOrestry JOUrnal, Decenb'er, 1917 Blitish Columnbia 'à Witb the wealth of forest products this province has to offer to the mar- kets of the world, combined with its geographical location in relation to rnich markets as South America, Aus- tralia, South Africa. India and China, British Columbia should do a large export trade. Some of these mnarkets 'will take the lower grades which are always prQduced when high grades are sawn. British Columbia has a large and important market in Can- ada, but 'wider markets absorbing ail grades wýill give that stabilizing in- fluence so necessary in the lumber industry to-day. A restricted market dependent on the success or other- wise of a grain crop in one partieular part of the world is too uncertain a fouadation for a business in so widely applied a staple produet as lumbr. herefore, we hope to broad- en our business and sell our produets in a greater nurnher of markets. We need variety in Our markets to' absorli all the produet of the log. T This will enable us to produce m~ore «, econonhically with a greater benefit fi to the consumer. la As a resuit of a better log mnarket lin British Columbia the export of- logs in 1916 amounted to but one- hlIf thle quantity exported in 1915. o Pulp and Ppri _In pulp and nqfnpr Pl Search fP MairketsI ~ree 'doctoring' , riveway. A broke hotus diseamea t Lck Of attention t îch year by our r nii1r~ In Ottawa's bea. 0 f a l1mb h.. aii, long. are in 1456",
         "1457 Canadian Forestry journal, Decem ber, 1917 Forst Reserves inBurina (Dealing with the question of laying down and putting through a strong policy for future reservation with the object of taking in ail areas capable of procuring marketable timber that' are unsuitable for permanent cultiva- tion and checking, the inroads of the taungya-cutter). A glance at the map of most fQrest divisions in Burma shows a number of forest reserves of various sizes, and that these reser'jes are for the most part more or less remote from the more populous parts. The chief reason for the former appears to have lain in the suspicious attitude of the authorities to reserva- tion, and, for the latter, to the boun- daries being thrown back in deference to the wishes of the villagers. Moreover, owing to the value of teak overshadowing that of ail other species, it is only in recent years that reservation in the interests of the latter lias received serious considera- tion. In throwing back the boundaries .of the reserves in deference to the wishes of the villagers, we certainly have not considered the best interests of the community. In accessible areas the throwing baek of the boundary bas resulted, so far as the excluded area was con- one time capable of producing mar-ý ketable timber are in a couple of decades reduced to wastes that are only reclaimable at an enormous out- lay. What the resuit of excluding forests in deference to the wishes of the vil- lagers lias been is emphasized by the fact that it is now necessary to, ser- iously consider the question of form- ing village forests, that is, within a ,generation the villagers and traders have squandered the resources of the accessible areas. Reserving by Potches. The Forest Off icer in the past was to a great extent compelled to take too narrow a view, but this view is, broadening and the same process of evolution lias lessened the suspicions with which the civilian authorities formerly regarded our operations. In the past we were compelled to re- serve in patches and to exclude mucli of the accessible areas. Should we continue in the future to allow without protest what re- mains of the unclassed forests to be turned int irreclaimable waste we 'hall j ustly lay ourselves open to the i eproacli of future generat'ons. As a resuit of our past policy the less accessible areas are reserved to a great extent and the more accessible steadily deteriorating, thougli bur- dened with troublesome regulations, made in a vain effort to stay their ruin and impossible to enforce ef-",
         "158Caniadian-Forestry Journal, Decem ber, 1917 of ail tracts capable, of producing timber or fuel. In carrying out this. reservation al lands suitable for permanent cultiva- tion should be excluded and definite areas shiould 'be set aside for such communities as muât exist by taungya cultivation. Commnunal Foresis. The settlement might be by tôwn- ships or any other suitable units and should be, carried ont on broad-nind-. ed limes. To begin with unnecessary bogies, such as that relating to the use of fire in areas unlikely to be brought under fîre-protection, should be eliminated from the proclamation. We should also revise our ideas on the subject of what constitute tres- pass by man and beast and modify the ruling, limîting the exercise of rights to t he number of houses actual- ly inhabiting a village at the time of settiement. The area, within a reasonable rad-' ius of habitations, should be reserved for management mainly as com- munal forests, the original inhabi- tants getting their produce free, and provision being made for immigrants, being as far as possible. provided for at privilege rates. The profit on the management of such communal for- ests should be utilized for the benefit of the villages in their vicînity. It should not be considered trespass by man or beast to stray within a reasonable distance of a right of way. Above ail the necessity Ïor dealng with unimportant techinical oflences in a broad-minded way shioulci be iinpressed on Divisional Forest Offi- cers.-f(Qffîcial Bulletin) WILSON AVE., ST. THOMAS. Described by Mr. Thomas Adams, Town Planning Expert of the Comn- mission of Conservation as \"4an in- ex esiveand attractive street suit- ayefr suburban and eirrt districts whichi are served by single- track street railwayvs. 'l'le flower beds at the intersecions are planted and maintejned by the Hlorticulturai Society. (See eut on page 1427.) STERE OPTICONS Dyou ne a Lan In School, in College or as a travelling lect urer ? The \"McINTosH'\" Stereopticons wîll mneet your ideal of what projection should be. For thirty-nine years ïMcJntosh lanterns have been demanded by the most dis- crimninating users ot the United States and Canada. Let us know your requirements. Do you want an. ideal instrument to projeet opaque objeets? Or the most compact lantern ia the world for travelling? Or a higgr machine with dissolving efl'ects? Perfect lenses, high class workxnanship, beautiful finish and at most reasonabi e prices. Eicintosti Stereopdicon Servic BROOTI BUILDING - - - OTTAWA 1458",
         "1459 Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 FAIREBANM FIRE FIGHTIP These compact powerfulllittl? pi substantiated our claims during Tbey can b. readily transpc horse can go. Goverments and Private OwnE materially reduce their fire loss Full information an~ THE CANADIAN FAIRBM?",
         "Canadian'Forestry Journal, December, 1917 -- . - .~ - s s ~; ci~ h - *~5 E NI.. SU S 5h hO N.- ~oe ai.. ~ S \u003cfIhS - s- - - s- oe- o O 1460",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 lMOST RELIABLE U, GT \"ATALU AT BE3T DEALERS OR DIRECT M WINNPC - AGUVER. -rry This siump puile ery tree at Our Rish Zhil \" d and sturnp by tbe roots, clearing -1r,- ne to 111I-ý- --l- - -Y, d'tng tiýn ý.riý t týer)ry Men. Ive anc or ur 3 v..ý 9-1-n- e 0 t n\",-,e ulier \"Il 'lu ' eery tree 7Z.nin.01 b...k.1ge and our h B timith s C Ir Co« Lacý'-rasc.,at, mi. YALE UNI VERSITYi FOREST SCHOOL Nzw HAVEN, CONNECTICUT, U.S.A. YAILE University Forest oSchool is s £graduate deparýzpnt of yae Uni- TREES, SHRUBS AND SEEDS i..rdy Northern Trees and Shrubs e Lo*eet Prices. Native and Foreign Trae Seeda EDYE-DE-HORST \u0026SON,DENNYNURST DRÉyDEN, ONT. Shippers to H. M. Govern- ment, Et.c. Correspondence Frmncaîse.j i-H11sSe-edlings and Transplants HiL'SOTe Seeds for Reforesting. Best for over hafacnuy Immense stock of leadin5 Ihardy sorts at low prices. Write for price luit and Imenti on this mnalazine. jForestPlsnters Guide Free. n Te D. Hill Nurbsery Co., Evorgr.en apeolaliste Box 503 Dundee, Ill., U.S.A. BAG MATTRESS m\u003csats treet. N.Y For further informnation sddress jAMES W. TOUMEY, Directef New Haven . Connecticut 1461 'mis MM No",
         "1462 anadian Foreslry Journal, Decem ber, 1917 CONFEDERATION ASSOCIATION UNCONDITIONAL ACCUMULATION POLICIES whichguarantee to the insured every benefit consistent withI safety. Write for Particulars which wiII gladly be fuarnished by any representative of the comnpany or the HEAD OFFICE, TORONTO IMINIATURE CONSTRUCTION Landscape, Mechanicai and Achiltec- J turai Models, Topographical Maps and' Paintings. for SCIIOOLS - COLLEU - MUSEUMS Goverament work a specialty MORGAN BROS. CO., Inc. MODEL MAKERS ]Room 1650 Grand Central Terminal Phone 7720 Murray Hill NEKW YORE CITY R. 0. SWEEZEY* B. Se., M. Can. Soc. C.E. CONSULTING ENGINEER. water Powers. Tiniber Lands. Forest Industries. 164 St. James St. MONTREAL. QUEEN'S UNI VERSITY KINGSTON ONTARIO ARTS ME'DiCINE -ÉDUCATION APPLIED SCIENCE Mjning. Chemical, 'Civil, Mechanical a'nd Electrical Engineering. HOME STIJDY Arts Course'by correspondience. Degree with, one Year's attendance. SuMMe ShooI Navigation SchoeI JuIy and Auguat. Deceuser to April. GEO. Y., CHOWN, UNIVERSITY 0f NEW BRUNSICK FREDERICTON, N.B. DEPARTMENT 0F FORESTRY Eatabljahed in 1908 Best of facilities for definite ini- struction and supervision in Practi- cal Forestry. Surveying, cruising and construc- tion work carriecl on in our own tract of 3600 acres, with Foreatry CGam in the centre. Campetent men fromn the School at present in demnandi to take up Forest Survey work with the Provincial Crown Land Department. For further information addreaa: DEPARTMENT 0F FORXSTRY Univerity Calendar furniah.d on application. C. C. JONES, Chancellor. 1462",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 J I I 3o,000,009 Feet of Los from a New Brunsw'i On One of the Beautiful Elm-lined Streets of Fredericton, N. B. 1463",
         "1464 Canadian Forestry Journal, Decem ber, 1917 Every Forester and Lumberman Should Have This Book HANDBOQK 1 ' FOR RANGERS AND WOODSMEN By JAY L. B. TAYLOR Forest. Ranger, United States Forest Service. This Handbook wil be a helpMu guide to ail engaged ln woods work, and those whose recreation takes them into rough and unsettled reglons. It ha\" bnpre- Pared as a result of the author's experlence in field work of the U ltedStates Forest Service. A feature of this book Is Its convenîent 97re aud the flexlbility of its bludlng. 429 pages, 4 V x 6ý/4, 236 figures. Flexible bidlng, $2.50 net. THE ESSENTIALS 0F AMERICAN TIMBER LAW By J. P. KINNEY, A.B., LL.B., M.F. l'hie volume ha. been prepared to ineet the neede of those engaged i the. study or practice of forestry, aud the. requirements of lumbermeui and others iterested directiy ln the production aud sale of timber producta. 308 pages, 6 x9. Gloth, $3.00 net. 2ND EDITION, THOROUGHLY REVISED THE THEORY AND PRACTICE 0F WORKING PLANS (Foret Organization) By A. B. RECKNAGEL, B.A., M.F., Professor of Forestry, Cornell University. la this editiomi the. auhr s brought thie book into accord wlth the. beat usae ftoday. Mapy Imotn change@ have been made whicb hicreasea Its useulnssto heforester. 279 pages, 6 x 9. fllu.strated, Cloth, $2.00 net. Canadian -Forestry Journal 119 B3ooth Building, OTTAWA 1464",
         "Canadian 'Forestry Journal, December, 191746 P. L. BUTTRICK FORESTERS AUD RANGERS CONSULTING FORESTIER EVERYTHING'YOU NEED NEW HAVEN, CONN., U. S. A. CAN BE SUPPLIED BY US P. O Box 607 TIMBER ESTIMÂATES UTILIZATION STUDIES' PLANTINO PLANS La.ndscape anid General Forestry Work. Eight years experience in .practical forestry work of ail sorts. PHILIP T. COOLIDGETaeLo u FORESTER ý Techaical training and ten years Lme = p inl part with U. S. Foest Trausits Gauges Mme E\u0026c.iqan aP11 Levels, \u0026c. Survyin \u003e ores . laninuThe Ontaio Hughes Owen Comipany STETON BDG. 31 ENTAL 529s Sussex St OTTAWA,-ONT. 50CTS.0 WfAR TIME SPECIAL OFFER ONE WHOLE YEAR FOR FIFTY CENTS! We are desirous of addlng 1,000 iiew naimes to our list t1118 montix and to juake it a certainty that we lot be disappoi1Ited we are offerlng ROD AND) GUN IN CANADA to you aind 999 others for Twelve MOnths for 50 cents. W. J. TAYLOR LIMITEI), Publiher - Woodtok, Ont. 1465",
         "Cana dian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 The Canadian Forestry Association (Eighteenth Year) 119 BOOTH BUILDING, OTTÂWA, CAN. Patron. HIS EXCELLENCY THE GOVERNOR-GENERAL. Honorary Presid..nt.ý RT. HON. SIR ROBERT L. BORDEN. Honorary Past President, RT. HON. SIR WILFRID LAURIER. Presîdent, HON. SYDNEY FISHER. Vice-President,-GORDON C. EDWARDSý Treasurer. MISS M. ROBINSON, Booth Building, Seeretary, ROBSON BLACK, i Ottawa, Can. Lt.-Col. j. B. Miller, F. C. whitum, William Little, Hirami Rabinson, E. S tewart, W. B. Snowball, Thomas Southworth, Han. W. C. Edwards, Gea. Y. Chawn, lion. W. A. Chsrlton, Wmn. Pawer, M.P.P., Hon. W J. Roche, Sir Geo. H. Perley. Alex. MacLaren. R. H Campbell, Dr. B. E. Fernow. Eilwood Wilson, Senator Bastock, G. C. Piche. Alex. MacLaurin. Mgr. P\u003e. E. Roy, A. P. Steveuson. Wmn. Pearce, C. E. E. Usaher, Denis Murphy. C. Jackson Booth, Sir Wmr. Price, J. W. Hsrkom, A. S. Goodeve, W. C. J. Hall, J., S. Dens, J. B. White, E. J. Zavitz, Geo. Chahoon. Jr., R. D. Prettie, Hon. N. Curry, A. C Flurnerfeit, H-. R. MacMillan, Clyde Leavitt, Albert' Grigg, J. T. Horne. Territorli Vic,-Presidents. Ontario-Hon. G. Howard Ferguson. Quelecs\u003e.Hon. Jules Allard. Newç Brunswick:-Han. George J.'Clarke Nova Scotia:-Hon. O. T. Daniels. Manîtobs:-Hon. T. C. Narris. Prince Edward Island:-Hon. J. A. Mathesas. Saskatchewn-Hon. W. M. Mart.in: Alberta-Hon. A. L. Siftan. British Columbia.-Hon. T. D. Pattula. Yukon-HIon. Geo. Blsck, Comamissianer. Ungavs-His Grâce Mgr. Bruchesi, Archbishop of Montreal. The Association prepares and places throughi its Publicity Departmnent, many hundreds of special articles every year, reaching the Canadian Public through daily and weekly newspapers, weekly and monthly magazines, including agricultural, financial. religious. literary, engineerin. juveule n rcial i iiin !Cnde journalismn. Co-operates actively withi forest protective associations, Goverument forest departments and commerél organizations ini distributing information on forest affaire tu the Canadian public.* Campaigns for Forest protection through its Pnblicity Departmnent, the distribution of iilustrated Iiterature to settiers. campers. etc., the presentation of lanteru slide cartoons in'motion picture theatres, and many other methods 4calciilated ta bring practical resuits. Holds serie of iilustrated public lectures on ýfarest protection in various sections of the Dominion. Issues an illustrated monthly, -The Canadien Forestry Journal,-~ which goes to 4,500 mnembers, snd to 200 Canadian editors by whom. it la queted extenslvely. Holdg conventions in variaus sections of the country tu dfiseuss local sud general Forest problenis, snd ta àrouse interest lin public forcit policies. A Frae Cartoon Service-is supplied ta newspspcrs RIsa a frac \"eut\"' service, campaignina for forest pro- tection through interesting illustrations. These are a few of the cancerns o! the Canadian Forestry Association. Support is entirely frorn valuntary sources. The Association is flot ldentified with any Gaverameat or pecisi intereat. MEMBERSHIP APPLICATION BLANK. Secretary, Canadian Forestry Association, 119 Booth Building, Ottawa, I hereby accept membership in the Canadian Forestry Associa- tion entitling me to a year's subscription to the Canadian Forestry Journal and ail other publications. I enclose $ ... ........ Class o! M enbershlp.......................... Anna l .......i.. . ..31.00 C ontributing .... 1. 5.00 ....... ...... ... ..... LIfe ___,,...... .........25 .00 .................... ........ ... .......... . .....................4.... Wf-Plsse deaiate ctas o! memberahip prster.d, 1466",
         "Canadian Forestry Journal, December, 1917 16 A Fre lecture in Your Locality on, \"Guarding the Forests\" The C anadi an Forestry Association provides free of charge special lecture outfits, conisisting of 56 photographie, lantern slides (many in colors) and a complete manuscript. Can you make use of tis in Your locality? .\u003c1These 'forest travelogues' have proved of lively interest wherever shownA. -The Manuscript discusses entertainingly the subject of f orests,% f orest 'industries, fire ranlgers, lessons from' home and abroad, the trail of the Fire Demon), etc. For each lantern slide a descriptive paragraph is -provided. Anyone having a steropticon can give the lecture effectively and there is no0 duil inaterial in it . A 'forest travelogue' in French will presently be'available. Arrangemenlts have been made for the purchase and circuitling of moôtion pictureë- reels showing forest8 inl flames, and old and new methods of fire prevention. An Ontario school principal said of our lecture outfit: \"We ail enjoyed the scenes, and ideas expressed in. the lecture were timely and instructive.\" From a Quebec user: \"We gave the lecture at two points and everybody was much pleased.\" Fromna Westr clrymn \"I gave the lecture before liked it greatly and I cougratulate the Association for takmng thsexcellent means of awaiceniiig the public.\" CANADIAN FORESTRY ASSOCIATION 119 BOoTH BUILDING, OTTAWA. 1467",
         "Ô -- ~ - PETERBOROUGH CAN'OES àkuG For service our CanvasCovered Canoes are unequalled. ~ Cn We mnake a complete line of Canoes, Skiffs and Motor Craft. Our catalogueý will be of interest to you. Peterborough Canoe- Co., Mt., Peterborough,- Ci SLEEP ON L with a COMFORT SLEEPING Recommended bjr the Forest Service Physiciens, Invalids, Tuherculis Pl Sgortsmen everywhere. A warin. dr able bed. Wind, rein. cold and % Packs 6r x25. Air goods for hoi yacht. canoe. etc. Ilinstrated Gir by nientioning Canadien Forestry Ji ATHOL MANUFACTURING ATIIOL. MASS., U.S.A., \u003cSuccessors to Metropolita Air Gooda Go.) Des Make the lite of the forestier better Ael rth living. They relleve hi. toi theappllii oneliness. They help bin to kep in hmnvor.e touch wt frsegmiles away. in emergencle--5e--lckiise-hun- V ger-the speed wlth whlch they cas summon help in marvellous. Write for full Perriculars of how to install the Northern Electrîr Forest Telephone Systena. Addrese the Office nearest you. Mn or# lctrc $binpan 5e Montreal Toronto 1 Ke$lna Hlalifax London Galgary Ottawa Wlunlp.gl Vancouver"
      ],
